_	HGO presented a “triumphant” and “groundbreaking” production of the Gershwins’ "Porgy and Bess" in 1976 that restored portions of the work that had been cut for previous productions (including some made by George Gershwin himself for the New York premiere in 1935), thus allowing the public to experience the Gershwins’ original vision and making it clear that the work was indeed an opera.
_	Later that evening, a concert took place in the school hall, which displayed all the work that the students had done during the day.
_	The author states in his preface to the work that, "a compendious account of Greek cults [...] has long been a desideratum in English," and as such Farnell wrote "The Cults of the Greek States" to sate that desire.
_	The introduction is itself an interpretative gesture of the work that follows it.
_	Robert Rubsam of Popmatters described the album as "Broadrick's poppiest, most beautiful, and, arguably, most satisfying collection since 2006," while commenting: "as much as it feels like another step towards that light, the album reflects the work that came before it."
_	She describes this art as "an extension of the work that I've been doing on the front lines, of the struggle to remove stereotypes and symbols that reinforce the stereotype of the Native people".
_	Much like the workers, they come to the Dominican Republic to find work and a better life and stay due to the work that they find in the mills that they cannot find in Haiti.
_	Here he produced the work that first brought Rosmini to the notice of English-speaking students: "The Philosophical System of Antonio Rosmini-Serbati, translated, with a Sketch of the Author's Life, Bibliography, Introduction, and Notes" (London, 1882).
_	At a formal memorial service held on 30 October 1946, two and one half months after Wells's death, at the Royal Institution, William Beveridge read passages from it, calling it the work that had influenced him the most.
_	Each track was assigned a sheet where all the work that had been done to that track had been logged, so by looking at the sheet it was possible to see how far along the track had been developed.
_	In essence, such works would be denied copyright protection unless the required copyright notice included a statement specifically identifying those parts of the work that were "not" U.S. Government work, and therefore subject to copyright protection.
_	As Foucault discussed in his essay "Nietzsche, Genealogy, History", Foucault's ideas of genealogy were greatly influenced by the work that Nietzsche had done on the development of morals through power.
_	Living in Tanera Mòr and Dundonnell before that, Fraser Darling began the work that was to mark him as a naturalist-philosopher of original turn of mind and great intellectual drive.
_	I think the work that they do in the skeptical arena is often underappreciated in academic circles because many specialists fail to grasp the potential consequences of the strong antirational and antisciencific trends in modern society.
_	Among the work that he did while there in the 1970s was presenting a series on BBC Schools television called "WALRUS" (Write And Learn, Read, Understand, Speak).
_	The railroad came to Western Newfoundland in 1898, and because of the work that the railway created, as well as access to many different types of goods, many people from outlying communities flocked to St. George's.
_	Musicologist Alan Lessem states about the work that "on the whole instrumental textures tend to become fuller as the work progresses" and that, in general, "the piano is the leading [instrumental] protagonist of the melodramas."
_	Initially the Conservancy continued the work that was already funded and started by the four founding organizations.
_	The UK's Nuclear Decommissioning Authority published a position paper in 2014 on the progress on approaches to the management of separated plutonium, which summarises the conclusions of the work that NDA shared with UK government.
_	At the same time, the size of support staff in his official bureaucratic position has often raised criticisms that he was less than directly responsible for the work that was constructed under his name, criticisms that underestimate the discipline control within a large, classically trained studio.
_	In 1958 he produced the work that boosted his career and won the 1958 BAFTA Award for Animated Film, "The Little Island".
_	In 1953, some Swiss Sisters of the Ursulines order came to India to continue the work that their founder had begun.
_	Though finding moments of unaccustomed discords preventing acceptance of the music as "beautiful", this critic concluded that "there is so much to admire in the work that it cannot be dismissed as a piece of buffoonery" .
_	However, most works of this early period in his career are not documented, and it is difficult to pinpoint with whom he collaborated with on the work that can be identified as his.
_	At eleven, Amos took a course at Morris Brown College, where she worked on her draftsmanship and took note of the work that African American college students were producing at the time.
_	Cooperants would also be expected to prepare to work in humble solidarity with local people, forming relationships as foundations for the work that needed to be done with the local organization.
_	When asked about reports of firefighters being hampered by British forces he said "Every available policeman and soldier in Cork was turned out at once and without their assistance the fire brigade could not have gone through the crowds and did the work that they tried to do".
_	In the prologue of the first recension of the "Confessio Amantis", he tells how the king, chancing to meet him on the Thames (probably circa 1385), invited him aboard the royal barge, and that their conversation then resulted in a commission for the work that would become the "Confessio Amantis".
_	This surgeon’s guild and the university seemingly viewed the work that Peronne was performing as a threat to their well-being and the distinct separation between the work of physicians and surgeons as she is the only case of a female surgical practitioner being prosecuted by the Parisian medical faculty during this time period.
_	However, the Commission acknowledges that its report is only a summary of the work that it did, and that it specifically cites only a fraction of the sources it consulted.
_	Snow later went so far as to accurately propose in his 1855 edition of the work that the structure of cholera was that of a cell.
_	Judge Paul said that the work that interns did at that time was to bring immediate benefits to employers in the same way that existing paid employees did, and the knowledge gained by interns working was not training by education for training.
_	The "man who was called and appointed of God" to "divide unto the Saints their inheritance"—Edward Partridge—was at that time out of order, neglecting his own duty, and putting "forth his hand to steady the ark"; hence, he was warned of the judgment of God impending, and the prediction was made that another, "one mighty and strong," would be sent of God to take his place, to have his bishopric—one having the spirit and power of that high office resting upon him, by which he would have power to "set in order the house of God, and arrange by lot the inheritance of the Saints"; in other words, one who would do the work that Bishop Edward Partridge had been appointed to do, but had failed to accomplish.
_	At the conclusion of his arts training, Coyne began the work that would change him forever – he spent the three years, from 1965 to 1968, working as a social therapist and psychiatric nurse at Whittingham Hospital near Preston in Lancashire and then for "The Soho Project" in London as a drugs counsellor.
_	Despite having to do custom work to make the game run smoothly on the Switch, Psyonix's Jeremy Dunham was impressed with the work that had been done before release.
_	It was felt that his major contribution while working for the London Diamond Companies was the work that he did with the African correspondents of the UK press and the excellent contacts he established in UK and foreign diplomatic circles.
_	The idea for a memorial was raised with retired Major David McNally Robertson in 1997, who was informed that, while many countries had a national monument to the work that women undertook during the Second World War, the UK did not.
_	Yates said in a 2014 NPR interview, "There were no other organizations out there that were doing the work that we wanted to do, that had the type of people - younger people, that were utilizing the tools that we were utilizing so effectively to get the word out and really become our own media."
_	After Sonnenblick's death in 2007, a tribute published in the prominent peer-reviewed journal "Circulation Research" remembered Sonnenblick as "simply an intellectual giant in the field of cardiovascular research, and the work that he did will forever shape everyday treatments of heart disease."
_	Vagina Monologue founder, Eve Ensler, wrote a 2011 spotlight monologue entitled "Myriam" as a tribute and rallying cry to the work that Myriam accomplished in Haiti.
_	The aim is to promote efficient and effective operations, and allow recording of the work that was done and reporting on whether or not the objective was achieved.
_	Much of the work that the AC Academy carries out is in the bottom 10% of deprived areas in the UK, such as Hillfields in Coventry, Sparkbrook in Birmingham, and Newham, Hackney, and Tower Hamlets in London.
_	"'I am a proud black feminist and womanist and I'm extremely proud of the work that's being done.
_	The 'body in art' has been the fundamental source of inspiration for my entire practice of the last 15 years, and the work that I have in my collection reflects this.
_	As director at the U.S. Commission on Civil rights, Ken L. Marcus instituted a number of important changes and his successors continued the work that he had begun in reinvigorating the agency.
_	Haak's work with the Royal Society was similar to the work that had so far engaged him throughout his life—translation, correspondence, and diffuser of knowledge.
_	He left behind NOK 3.3 million collected for various projects, and this provided the basis to create the Strømme Foundation to continue the work that Strømme had started.
_	A picture of the Nauvoo Temple is then shown with three sentences praising the work that Smith has done, ending with some of Smith's words from the book the Doctrine and Covenants "Shall we not go on in so great a cause?" (128:22).
_	Few persons realize that it was a modest, slow speaking Detroit doctor who was in a great measure responsible for much of the work that was done for those children of France.
_	Although the promise of CHRP has never been fully realized, the work that Apple had done on CHRP significantly helped in the designing of the iMac.
_	Account planners (sometimes also called brand planners and strategic planners) use primary and secondary research to inform their strategic thinking and are ultimately responsible for the work that informs, and the penning of, the creative brief.
_	Who's depending on the work that must be done
_	Stereogum noted that, while the band's first single, "Sultan Curse" contained the atmosphere of their earlier work, "Show Yourself" instead sounded like the "grungy chug-brood more in line with the work that the band has been doing in recent years".
_	It was not until the 1828 edition of the work that "Monody" was added to the "Juvenile Poems" section, but it was the 1796 version although Coleridge did alter the work between 1803 and 1828.
_	He also created the work that was posthumously to be called "Bourinot's Rules of Order".
_	It was inspired by his participation in the Kinder trespass, a protest by the urban Young Communist League of Manchester, and was the work that began MacColl's career as a singer-songwriter.
_	Thomas was also tasked with organising and supervising the work that was necessary to prepare the settlement for the settlers.
_	Kim Jong-il states in the work that "Juche" is not a creative application of Marxism–Leninism, but rather "a new era in the development of human history" while criticizing the "communists and nationalists" of the 1920s for their elitist posture, claiming that they were "divorced from the masses".
_	A.R. Bean, in his 2000 taxonomic revision of "Stylidium" subgenus "Andersonia", noted that this taxon is highly variable and that additional field work may reveal morphological and genetic differences significant enough to reveal additional species, similar to the work that resolved the "S. graminifolium" species complex.
_	But Holyoake had meanwhile contributed so much to the work that a fourth edition was published as almost his own, with the title ‘Dictionarium Etymologicum Latinum,’ &c., 3 pts., London, 1633.
_	Already before enrolling at Purdue, Crull had shown an interest in becoming a newspaper reporter and was familiar with the work that Walter Williams had done to promote journalism, including the founding of the Missouri School of Journalism.
_	Milan Kundera describes the tensions between the novelist's own identity and the work that the author produces in his essay in "The New Yorker" titled "What is a novelist?"; he says that the novelist's "honesty is bound to the vile stake of his megalomania [...]The work is not simply everything a novelist writes-notebooks, diaries, articles.
_	Surface energy is conventionally defined as the work that is required to build an area of a particular surface.
_	The show focuses on the work that Sydney goes through in her DJ career, along with what she does in her free time to get away from it all.
_	Another project that came his way was the work that was published as "Memoirs of the Late Thomas Holcroft", a compilation of autobiographical writing by the recently deceased playwright, novelist, and radical political activist, together with additional material by Hazlitt himself.
_	In July 1943 he took part in the work that led to the drafting of the Code of Camaldoli.
_	Although their version of the film never reached production, the work that Jodorowsky and his team put into "Dune" did have a significant impact on subsequent science-fiction films.
_	"It is impossible to estimate too largely the work that the Lord will accomplish through His proposed vessels carrying out His mind and purpose.
_	This is considered to be Stribling's first serious novel as well as being the work that introduces to the world his ability to reconstruct not only the landscape of the South, but the heartache as well.
_	In its own way, it keeps the memory of Stephen present and reminds us of all the work that Doreen and the Stephen Lawrence Trust have achieved since its foundation."
_	They receive a rundown of what was supposed to be done, inspect what was left from the work that was done, and learn about the contractor and how much he was paid to do the work.
_	Sometime in the middle of these deliberations, Yuguda came to me and said the party was reimbursing the 18 elders of the committee for their transportation, accommodation and feeding allowance for the work that was done.
_	A worker’s social class predicts the work that he or she will qualify for, and those who are most successful in their home country are most able to continue to be successful by improving the economic and social situation of their household.
_	His investigation of electrochemical potentials at low temperatures was among the work that led, in the hands of others, to the Nernst heat theorem and the Third law of thermodynamics, although not without heated debate between Nernst and Richards.
_	By 1960, Bennett had come to the conclusion that the practice of 'latihan' alone was inadequate, and he resumed the work that he had learned from Gurdjieff.
_	Shortage of funds restricted the work that could be done.
_	One day Tree-ear goes into Min's yard and investigates the work that he was drying in the sun.
_	Finally, Tayluer is quite explicit in describing the work that was done by the men as they sang the song, making it unmistakably a sea shanty sung at the capstan, and this was duly noted by Doerflinger, who wrote "The Leaving of Liverpool (Capstan Shanty Version)" in his notes on the recording.
_	The arctic char was initially scientifically described in the salmon genus "Salmo" as "Salmo alpinus" by Carl Linnaeus in the 1758 edition of "Systema Naturae", which is the work that established the system of binomial nomenclature for animals.
_	He was hired by Charles R. Van Hise as a stenographer in 1892 to work on his publications, and was so taken by the work that he completed a bachelor's degree in geology at the University of Wisconsin in 1897 and a Ph.D. in 1901.
_	In 1967 Ursula met and briefly lived with Diane Arbus whilst in New York, after attending the "New Documents" exhibition at the Museum of Modern Art. Arbus' photography was to have a profound influence on the work that followed.
_	It is in this main part of the work that the character Cyrus is often shown as an example of classical virtue, but is also at the same time often seen as showing Machiavellian tendencies.
_	In 1980, she published "Umi no Miyako no Monogatari" (Story of the City of the Sea), the work that made Shiono a nationally known figure.
_	Because of significant differences in details, which can not be traced back to a common basic shape, it is assumed that Bach himself composed the various different versions of the work that are in circulation.
_	The feast is in a barn in the summertime; two sheaves of grain with a rake recalls the work that harvesting involves, and the hard life peasants have.
_	Allaham told "The Jerusalem Post" on June 21 that he is "proud of the work that Mort Klein has done and all the other Jewish leaders working in collaboration with the Emir and other members of the Qatari Royal Family."
_	The British House of Commons recorded its appreciation of the work that the two Yorubas had done for their country.
_	Allen recovered from Thomas Young's widow, who was living in Albany, the manuscript that he and Young had worked on in his youth and began to develop it into the work that was published in 1785 as "Reason: the Only Oracle of Man".
_	He received a Captain's Chair for the work that he did at Bard.
_	The feminist art group Sisters of Jam (Mikaela & Moa Krestesen) turned the necklace into a mobile monument; they see the eye bolt "as a symbol for the work already done but also as an encouragement for the work that is not yet completed."
_	This, in addition to the financial costs that went into the super soldier program, convinces the scientists to complete the work that turns
_	According to Gabriel, although he and arranger John Metcalfe had talked about Arvo Pärt and Steve Reich as inspiration, it was the work that Metcalfe did on "Heroes" that "gave us the confidence to be bold in the way in which we were going to approach the record."
_	In an interview with the Boston Herald Tanya Prive stated that the work that RockThePost is doing “democratizes the process of funding for startups and that the power of fundraising was going to be substantially increased.
_	Current and future generations are able to be seen differently due to the work that Jane Priestman has accomplished.
_	If employees feel an emotional connection to the work that is facilitated through the manager, work will be done more effectively and the employees will be able to be more productive.
_	VOWD represents the full value of the work that has been achieved, at a point in time, against the commercial criteria of the commitments for that work, regardless of payment or receipt.
_	As the liberal gains of the 1848 revolutions fell victim to coercive governments or were swallowed by powerful social forces such as class, religion and nationalism, Rochau—according to Bew—began to think hard about how the work that had begun with such enthusiasm had failed to yield any lasting results.
_	He had long said that this was the work that he was most proud of, despite the criticism that he received for it.
_	Regarding the war itself he says, "The Korean War is labelled 'the Forgotten War', and the main reason is [American GIs] never got a parade when they got back, they never got relief, they never were cited for their effort for the work that was done.
_	He announced an unchanged cabinet, stating "in order to finish the work that have we started, the ministerial architecture will remain , that is, Ministers will remain with their assigned portfolios."
_	Other works, although not as monumental as the previous ones, also had their place in the distributed architecture for the municipality of Marbella, and goodbye to a friend, the work that decorated the facade of the Parish of Nueva Andalucía .
_	Its serenity stands in contrast to the work that followed it, "Greetings from an old world", commissioned by the Clarion Music Society of New York City in 1976.
_	He was highly regarded as a restorer; a spokesman for the Society for the Protection of Ancient Buildings said of his 1898 restoration of Salisbury Cathedral spire "conducted in the most conservative way possible ... I am confident that anyone who had been privileged to see the work that is being done ... would not withhold his subscriptions even though he was as ardent an anti-restorer as your obedient servant."
_	At times everything felt so destitute and hopeless that he doubted whether he would ever be able to do the work that he still believed he was created to do, in a way he himself would be content with – and if he couldn't manage that, there would be no reason to live even.
_	Women and children help mostly with sanding and painting, leaving men to contribute less than half of the work that goes into the figures.
_	Much of what we have accomplished can be linked back in a fairly direct way to the work that he did in the 1950s and ’60s."
_	He founded the Suore Domenicane dello Spirito Santo in 1872 while in San Miniato culminating the work that he began almost a decade prior.
_	Schwoerer and Lundstrom were intrigued by the work that Moje was producing and invited him to the factory (really just a house in SE Portland).
_	If the option was not available, workers would be required to accept the work that was available.
_	Much of the work that Hazen was doing could be classified as mineral physics, a cross between geophysics and mineralogy.
_	It was the work that brought Britten to international attention.
_	This is not to say that the works are "simple", because many words are complex, but, as Donald Davie explains, there is a "naiveté" in the work that allow them to be understood.
_	Then, in 1948, he learned of the work that John W. Mauchly and Presper Eckert were doing with the EDVAC and BINAC computers.
_	The implications of the results so far are that effective software managers must not just understand the technical aspects of the work that their staff are doing, but must also understand their staff as individuals and how they can best work together in teams.
_	In July 1875 the Commodore responsible for the office, describing the work that had been accomplished in the previous year, called for a permanent building with proper fireproofing instead of the temporary rented premises, and asked for funding to conduct a proper survey of the Pacific Ocean, for which the charts were in many areas inadequate.
_	Crowdfunded journalism has given more power and control to the audience which can raise concerns for the journalists because there is a second party that dictates the work that is created and presented.
_	Working dogs have always learned to obey commands related to the work that they historically performed, such as when a herding dog moves a flock of animals in response to a shepherd's whistled directions, or a hunting dog searching for (or chasing down) quarry or leaving the treed quarry at the hunter's command.
_	The Japanese said that during their boom years, illegal immigrants performed the work that was "Kiken, Kitsui, Kitanai", or "Dangerous, Difficult, (and/or) Dirty".
_	"Birth Control" is remembered today as the work that contained the passages that Stopes asserted were defamatory, which led to the Stopes v. Sutherland case.
_	The king was so pleased by the work that he offered Rousseau a lifelong pension.
_	By the morning of June 12 the flood waters began to fill parking lots of businesses along the riverfront, including the Port of Burlington and Memorial Auditorium, both of which sit at the river's edge, by the morning of June 16, both buildings had flooded up to the main floor, as the flood waters seeped through cracks between the sandbags, rendering the work that had been done to protect them useless, the outdoor stage that is connected to the south facade of the Port of Burlington building was not visible, nor were the access ramps that run along the entire western entrance.
_	This means that we need to have an extremely grounded belief in ourselves and the work that we do.
_	This type of drain was experienced in different ways as well, for instance, British workers earning wages that were not equal with the work that they have done in India, or trade that undervalued India's goods and overvalued outside goods.
_	Using these mice, Tuveson has made several important discoveries in the biology of pancreatic cancer, including the work that contributed to the idea that the stromal cells of pancreatic tumors act as a barrier for therapies.
_	Food enters the body effectively partly digested, and as such food processing reduces the work that the digestive system has to do.
_	In 2014 Hostage UK’s work was recognised by the UK government when Hostage UK’s director Rachel Briggs was appointed an OBE in recognition of the work that Hostage UK does.
_	One of the effects of the introduction of internal assessment and of broad framework syllabuses was a marked increase in the workload of teachers, with respect to curriculum development and assessment, as well as changes in the nature of the work that teachers were asked to perform.
_	His research was distinguished by a fidelity to the demands of experimental method very rare in the realms which he was exploring and, although often overlooked, the work that Rivers did in this early period is of immense import as it formed the foundation of all that came later.
_	The Institute of Latino Studies at the University of Notre Dame comments on this idea with Mexican women in mind, claiming that "much of the work that women do in the United States generates more income than it would in Mexico, allowing women to be much more financially independent."
_	In 1841, Edgar Allan Poe wrote in a review of the work that it was "positively beneath criticism and beneath contempt".
_	A vital element of Nova-Kino is “the usage of critical, political, and other highly charged points of view embedded within the structure of the work that challenge hegemonic power structures at large or in more specific realms.”
_	Metaprogramming is the writing of programs that write or manipulate other programs (or themselves) as their data or that do part of the work that is otherwise done at run time during compile time.
_	When she was younger and single she wanted to cover war stories and the like, but today she is quite satisfied with the work that she does.
_	According to Sutton, the improvised piano fantasia is the work that was later written out and published as the Fantasia in G minor, Beethoven's Opus 77 (1809).
_	At the end of the episode, Terry is named the most improved despite his noticeable imperfections, as he was the only one other than Candace to finish all of their tasks (Candace doing so due largely to the work that Justin had done).
_	Easy Eco International, a start up consultancy company that specialized in clean technology, continuing the work that he has done with Professor Gerbrand Ceder during his postgraduate study in Massachusetts Institute of Technology in United States.
_	Pliny devised a "summarium," or list of contents, at the beginning of the work that was later interpreted by modern printers as a table of contents.
_	Historian Nancy Farriss says of it, "Taylor's book will stand for a long time as the work that everyone in the field must consult, refer to, and reckon with."
_	As a participant in the greater outreach of Baptists in Toronto there was involvement also in the work that became College Street Baptist Church.
_	This was because using the internet was considered 'ok' to use for the vast majority of the work that the public sector does.
_	The film calls upon policy makers to support local initiatives like Rita's to bolster the resilience to climate change and to enhance the work that the women are already doing to protect communities against its risks.
_	The Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung considers that the author with the work that was awarded the Adelbert von Chamisso Prize, " created with Luka Lewadski a quirky and idiosyncratic character like from a story by Isaac Babel [has] a childish old man, whose last gasp finds against death expression in a language that balances the oscillation of waking and dream, of melancholic nostalgia and hunger for life."
_	In her final video she was dressed in black and holding a Koran while she stated that she was about to die as a symbol of the woman's fight against occupation, and that it was her desire to finish the work that had been started by her two cousins, and to honor the memory of Wafa Idris, Darine Abu Aisha, and Ayat al-Akhras.
_	Lawyer and LGBT activist Doug Elliott commented, "It's great that the young Trudeau is finishing the work that his father started."
_	There he also conducted the work that would lead to "Authentic School Science", in which he provides evidence for how high school students learn science when provided with opportunities to frame their own research questions, which they then answer by designing and conducting experiments.
_	Although Cincinnati's spectacular growth slowed after 1870, the work that continued included several buildings by Wilson.
_	If granted the literary rights of the series, however, Gabrielsson explains that she is not sure that it is fair for a ghostwriter to complete the work that Larsson had started.
_	Rutherford called a meeting of the new board on July 17, where the directors passed a resolution expressing "hearty approval" of the actions of their president and affirming him as "the man the Lord has chosen to carry on the work that yet remains to be done."
_	The idea of the work that there was a rigid equation between the media of the United States and American imperialism has, however, been questioned and revised by later works.
_	Two days later it was announced that the banks supporting the school were "satisfied with the work that has been done" and all parties agreed that the school would remain open for the 2012-13 school year provided there was a minimum enrolment of 220 pupils.
_	They are the written record of the work that is presented to fellow researchers.
_	Finally, the experts' critique of Terry's shed is that much of the work done so far is not his own work – and the work that Harvey has put in is not too great either.
_	This was the work that had made her famous in the film "Brief Encounter" in 1945, and it was to be her last concerto performance.
_	For much of the piece, Berio notates measures in seconds instead of bars, although there are some sections of the work that use traditional rhythmic notation.
_	The collection largely deals with the work that Freeman and James W. Watts did on psychosurgery over the course of their medical careers.
_	Along with his brother Robert, he was involved in the construction of the Tower of London (1501–1502), Bath Abbey, the Vertue brothers are reported as telling Bishop Oliver King the patron of the work that the vaulting "Ther shal be noone so goodeley, neither in England nor in France" and the vaulting and the clerestory windows and walls of the Henry VII's chapel at Westminster, between 1506–09, though Robert Virtue was dead by then and William is thought to be entirely responsible.
_	A campaign was set up on the crowdfund website Indiegogo, with the objective of raising $3,000 to buy Taylor a gift, as a token of the public's appreciation for the work that he and the team had done.
_	Employees with this approach think of their work as a game where the winner takes all instead of working with other employees to make sure everyone is contributing to the work that needs to be completed.
_	Due to the extent of the work that had to be carried out, "Imperator" remained at Liverpool until 21 February and during this time the company's annual dinner was held on board, before the ship returned to service on the North Atlantic.
_	From this report, additional rumors surfaced including that the work that Human Head had completed by this point was only for a demonstration version and far from a completed game, a claim denied by Human Head developers.
_	The date shown is the earliest publication or copyrighted (if not date performed or composed) of the work that are known of.
_	After the collapse of Communism, Mlynář saw opportunity to return home to Prague and continue the work that had been violently interrupted in 1968 with the events of the Prague Spring.
_	Money gives the illusion that it has a direct relationship to the work that is done.
_	In 2015, "Nature" dedicated an editorial to laud the work that Cattaneo and her supporters had achieved.
_	Many of the houses and workshops associated with archaeological projects in the north were looted, so the work that had been done was lost to the researchers.
_	As a freshman in the 2012 season, Pinion only appeared in five games with teammate Spencer Benton doing a majority of the work that season.
_	A former homicide detective, he is often hard on Benson and her squad, most notably during their early interactions, but ultimately respects the work that they do and frequently backs them up to the NYPD brass.
_	Consequently, such Performer's may not assert a copyright over their performance that is distinct from the copyright in the work that their performance was fixed in.
_	The grants are $1,200 each and subsidize the creation of school gardens with the intention of teaching students to understand the value of plant nutrition and to appreciate all the work that goes into farming to keep the U.S. and the world stocked with a plentiful supply of safe and affordable food, while preventing possible harmful environmental impacts.
_	Although Albert Poggio had not become Director of the House until 1989, he had been suggesting the creation of a "social centre" in London since 1969, due to the work that he developed as Chairman of the Gibraltar Group, which congregated Gibraltarian expatriates in London.
_	Members are encouraged to keep in touch with the Membership Development Worker to inform them of the work that they are doing in their local area or youth club.
_	In the dedication to Tonkin's "Parochial History of Cornwall",' 1733, the only part of the work that was printed, the author said Gwavas had helped him with Cornish vocabulary and texts.
_	In her final video she was dressed in black and holding a Koran while she stated that she was about to die as a symbol of the woman's fight against occupation, and that it was her desire to finish the work that had been started by her two cousins, and to honor the memory of Wafa Idris, Darine Abu Aisha, and Ayat al-Akhras.
_	The table below summarizes some of the work that has been done in this field for a sapphire substrate.
_	Benjamin compiled the source material for the work that would become "The Origin of German Tragic Drama", some 600 quotations from German baroque dramas, in the Berlin State Library in 1923.
_	This is unfortunate, considering the work that Preston actually carried out, and the conviction and enthusiasm he had for his subject matter.
_	Perhaps the work that better defines Scalabrini Ortiz is the "Five principles of inner cooperation" ("Cinco principios de cooperación interna").
_	We appreciate the work that our University counsel has provided during this process and can now maintain focus on moving forward as a University community."
_	Comparing one of Neri’s earlier figurative sculptures to the work that her father is best known for, a number of visual similarities are apparent and evoke the closeness of their relationship.
_	He then changes his mind, takes the case while always providing a perspective that is contrary to the work that he is actually assigning his staff."
_	Additionally, the headquarters of the Tamil Nadu Congress Committee was named Satyamurti Bhavan in his honour and in recognition for the work that he did for the Tamil Nadu Congress and for the goal of Indian independence as a parliamentary democracy.
_	Gottesman and Shields published "Schizophrenia and Genetics" to document their twin-study research at the Maudsley Hospital in London, the work that in part earned them the Hofheimer Prize for Research, the highest award for psychiatric research from the American Psychiatric Association.
_	The bishop made such deprecating comments about the work that Wright decided to keep the painting and this story was made into a poem by Wright's friend William Hayley and eventually published in "The Reliquary".
_	As drainage progressed, Broward began taking his fiercest opponents for "ocular displays" in the Glades, showing them the work that had been done and how it was progressing.
_	Though Tardieu’s textbook on the legal medicine of poisoning was the work that did most to establish him as an authority in his time, for the posterity he is most famous for his forensic study of sexual crimes: "Etude Médico-Légale sur les Attentats aux Mœurs"
_	8. Core units are integral to the work that students are doing in the Middle School.
_	It is defined as the work that must be done to move it from an infinite distance away to its present location, adjusted for non-electrical forces on the object.
_	By the start of the twentieth century, U.S. laws on unfair competition recognized three related causes of action: for incorrectly attributing another person's work to an author, for failing to give an author credit for their work, and for publishing a version of the work that substantially departs from the original as the author's work.
_	In contrast, it is my view that the work that has been carried out by the team of Thomas Kerr "et al" is scientifically well-founded and has contributed to reducing the extent of mortality and morbidity in association with the existence of the safer injection facility."
_	The Surveillance Camera Players have been the inspiration for others who have gone on to create artistic project that involve some form of surveillance, however, they say that although they are flattered that they inspire others, they’re rarely impressed by the work that is created.
_	It may be that the good offices of the Department can be used to ensure that some of the work that Robb Caledon takes on board is dispersed not only to the Burntisland yard but to the Dundee yard, in view of the present high level of unemployment.
_	Prokofiev premiered the work that same year, performing the solo piano part, on August 23 at Pavlovsk.
_	Adams was displeased with the original version of the work that was premiered by the San Francisco Symphony in March 2012.
_	Serial killers want accreditation for the work that they have done.
_	There is only one place where they can find the work that keeps them alive, and the support so they can start uncovering the mystery that killed their squad: that's in the south-Shinjuku bar called Chicago.
_	He says that, through the band's efforts to faithfully translate their LSD-inspired vision into music, ""Revolver" opened the doors to psychedelic rock (or acid rock)", while the primitive means by which it was recorded (on four-track equipment) inspired the work that artists such as Pink Floyd, Genesis, Yes and the Electric Light Orchestra were able to achieve with advances in studio technology.
_	Hollows was Ruit’s mentor and inspiration in the work that he does.
_	From the night of the Doodlebug raid until the completion of construction in 1958 – fourteen years—the work that normally took place in Essex Hall was displaced to some spare rooms at Dr Williams's Library in Gordon Square.
_	The petition seeks legislation that would get artists paid for the work that they do, in sync with the rest of the democratic world.
_	Figuring out where the work that you want to accomplish fits into the overall goals for the company is crucial to getting approval on those projects as well.
_	Three key events in 1956 led to its re-evaluation in the United States: first, RKO was one of the first studios to sell its library to television, and early that year "Citizen Kane" started to appear on television; second, the film was re-released theatrically to coincide with Welles's return to the New York stage, where he played "King Lear"; and third, American film critic Andrew Sarris wrote "Citizen Kane: The American Baroque" for "Film Culture", and described it as "the great American film" and "the work that influenced the cinema more profoundly than any American film since "Birth of a Nation"."
_	Trustees serve a term of three years, renewable for up to three terms, and are not paid for the work that they do for the Library District.
_	She believes that Banned Books Week is a reminder of the work that organizations such as the ALA do to help train librarians to keep us from sliding from challenging books to banning them.
_	The second Laird expanded the estate and continued the work that developed it into one of the largest and most lavish estates in Scotland.
_	When the workers dug up the mounds they had made, they found Gold, Silver or Copper coins commensurate with the work that they had done during the day.
_	In this regard, we welcome the work that has taken place in the Council for TRIPS and the Decision of the General Council of 6 December 2005 on an Amendment of the TRIPS Agreement."
_	The film pauses between acts to chronicle how they make comedy from their personal experiences as Muslims in post 9/11 America, behind-the-scenes footage into the comedians' day-to-day family lives, the work that goes into their show and how they prepare new material.
_	Annan commented on "The Interpreter" that "the intention was really to do something dignified, something that is honest and reflects the work that this Organization does.
_	They have no complaint to make about their food or the work that has been required of them, and there is every indication that their dissatisfaction arises from a desire to be discharged."
_	Smyth persisted in her attempts to see it staged elsewhere, but it was not until the conductor Thomas Beecham championed the work that a complete, staged performance was achieved in England in 1909 with funding support from her friend Mary Dodge.
_	Yet the work that Snow relied upon most heavily for "Magical Mimics" was Baum's sixth Oz book, "The Emerald City of Oz".
_	Teachers would also add qualitative information through ratings of brightness (estimate of the natural ability to do the work that the school requires under favorable conditions), singing (ability to sing as shown in public school music), and rhythmic action (child's ability to march, to skip, to dance, or take part in games requiring motor coordination).
_	Artist and patron quarrelled so violently over the room and the proper compensation for the work that the important relationship for Whistler was terminated.
_	The "U" term can be interpreted as the energy required to create the system, and the "pV" term as the work that would be required to "make room" for the system if the pressure of the environment remained constant.
_	We admire the work that the series creator Bryan Elsley did in adapting the show for MTV, and appreciate the core audience that embraced it."
_	The logical implication from this provision is that modifications to the work that do not prejudice the honour or reputation of the author are within the rights of the copyright owner.
_	A documentary, directed by Inka Achté, and called "Boys Who Like Girls" (2018) profiles some of the work that MAVA has done.
_	In 2001, Thorp was recognized by Fortune Small Business as a Small Business Innovator for the work that led to the founding of the company.
_	Similar praise came from Simon Watney, writing in "The Burlington Magazine", who said of the work that went into the new dictionary: "The result is a book of unrivalled authority, which employs a pleasurably straightforward format of biographies followed in each case by chronological sequences of religious and then secular works."
_	MANS has three layers; the conceptual model of documentation, the preferred expression format (vocabulary) for the model (the interpretation of DIDL XML) and, its top layer, the score, which serves as a record of the work that is database-processable.
_	It was in these years that Bellamy wrote "Looking Backward", the work that brought him fame.
_	Whereas in former times the kings my forefathers had created bronze statues imitating real-life forms to put on display inside their temples, but in their method of work they had exhausted all the craftsmen, for lack of skill and failure to understand the principles they needed so much oil, wax and tallow for the work that they caused a shortage in their own countries—I, Sennacherib, leader of all princes, knowledgeable in all kinds of work, took much advice and deep thought over doing that work.
_	The collaboration was initiated by Cornelius P. Rhoads who had run chemical weapons programs for the US army and had been involved in the work that led to the discovery that nitrogen mustards could potentially be used as cancer drugs, and had become the director of Memorial in 1948.
_	James Shirley staged it at the Werburgh Street Theatre in Dublin, and wrote a Prologue for the work that was published with Middleton's text in the first edition.
_	From 1898 to 1900 the Democrats continued to solidify political control in the General Assembly and across the state, undoing much of the work that had given blacks and poor whites better access to voting and participation in government.
_	As a result, the work that was due to begin on a new 900 MW coal-fired power station and industrial estate, Hatfield Power Park is looking unlikely.
_	Kim has been actively encouraging the students in his graduate classes at Stanford to take classroom projects to the real world, and some of the work that has come out of Seeds of Empowerment work has succeeded to the final rounds of global competitions sponsored by organizations including the Sesame Workshop, WISE by the Qatar Foundation, and the Marvell 100K Challenge.
_	"It's up to us to engage with consumers because we know there are those who do not appreciate the work that's being done and what that means for available and affordable food supply."
_	However, "DESERT JOURNAL" is the work that weiss herself describes as her masterpiece and her most significant work to-date.
_	Despite this however, she persevered and was able to write and publish the work that was significant to her—a truly remarkable feat for a woman of her time.
_	However, the work that she accomplished as a single woman, prior to her marriage, set her apart from many women of her time, whose husbands' work tended to open doors and overshadow women's accomplishments.
_	The ultimate scientific objective of the method is "to ... test theoretical findings against real-world data in ways that permit empirically supported theories to cumulate over time, with each researcher’s work building appropriately on the work that has gone before."
_	While, for the most part, the work that appeared in the shows seems to have been somewhat conservative in style, the members of the association were aware of current movements.
_	James Franco's appearances as a version of 'himself' on the daytime soap opera, General Hospital was inspired by Carter and can be seen as another facet or an extension of the work that began with the film, Erased James Franco.
_	Using this technique, a small number of triodes could be made to do the work that formerly required dozens of triodes.
_	Alternatively an organization might choose to automate a significant amount of the work that could be done manually therefore reducing the skills required to perform tasks.
_	After the elections, the stories of how the erstwhile government had tried to stall her planes, helicopters, cars, trucks, jet fuel, vehicle fuel and road blocks had been overcome by Smt. Gandhi brought the actual picture of the work that had been put in by Kapoor to ensure his leader won the election in a full mandate.
_	Knight offered to pay Davidson $2 per hour (about $14 per hour today) for the work that she completed.
_	For the work that Mary Morello put into this, she won a Hugh M. Hefner First Amendment Award in 1996.
_	While this entity-attribute-value model allows the developer to break out from the structure imposed by an SQL database, it loses out on all the benefits, since all of the work that could be done efficiently by the RDBMS is forced onto the application instead.
_	Although Ince's galleries remained little changed, the work that he started was hugely expanded in the years after the siege and new tunnels were built to connect to the first galleries.
_	Age wrote of the work that, “King’s overall argument is that the credit crunch and ensuing recession have intensified the need for innovation in the financial services sector.
_	The article states, "Some feel it is wrong to focus on the work that men — rather than women — do to help women fulfill their potential at work.
_	To those officers I want to say, you have my full support for the work that you do in upholding our laws."
_	Poovey has been recognised as important in the work that she has done in feminist reading.
_	Using them, the investigator may retrieve information from the work that has eluded investigators to date and also gain insight into Ibn al-Nadim's method of composition, ideology, and historical analyses.
_	The Company became the owner of the valley in exchange for supporting all the costs of the work that was planned and which began the following June.
_	In Spring 1946 he met Alfred Junge, who, after seeing the work that he had produced in Egypt, took him on to learn to be a sketch artist.
_	Skousen states in the work that the purpose of liberal internationalist groups such as the Council on Foreign Relations, is to push "U.S. foreign policy toward the establishment of a world-wide collectivist society."
_	This includes the discipline, exercises, and the work that Mitzvah Technique practitioners do with their hands.
_	In 2007, McGee was made a Companion of the Liverpool Institute for Performing Arts, in recognition of the work that he has carried out with students.
_	During her time in the US, Mandira Sen had come into contact with many women's rights activists and she wished to use this experience to highlight the work that was being done concerning women's issues in India; and to help educate people about the movement and its contributions to civil society.
_	Uddin and Begum based their scheme on the work that John Borthwick Gilchrist and others began at Fort William College in Calcutta more than a century prior.
_	They're going to move back in and all of the work that we've done, every young man that has lost his life in that country will have been for nothing because we've got a president that does not understand what's going on in that region" and Santorum said that "there are no classes in America."
_	She has a great love for the work that she does, "I love the program, I always have...
_	He classifies the work that he does under a sustainable development action plan with more than charitable momentary vision.
_	Completed in 1936 the students wanted to name the building Rogers Hall because of the work that was done by the president.
_	Shortly after the European tour ended, Horrorpops returned to the states to play Jimmy Kimmel Live and a few California shows, but realizing the work that lay ahead and how time-consuming the band had become, Mille had to leave the band to go back to school.
_	The series of "Remarks on some Passages in Dr. Prideaux's Connection" was included in the French editions of the work that were published in 1728, 1732, 1742, and 1744.
_	Baskin Engineering is home to several research centers, including the Center for Biomolecular Science and Engineering and Cyberphysical Systems Research Center, which are gaining recognition, as has the work that UCSC researchers David Haussler and Jim Kent have done on the Human Genome Project, including the widely used UCSC Genome Browser.
_	To bring a copyright infringement lawsuit, a copyright holder must establish ownership of a valid copyright and the copying of constituent elements of the work that are original.
_	The Faithful Shepherdess is a Jacobean era stage play, the work that inaugurated the playwriting career of John Fletcher.
_	As a teacher in twentieth century Ottumwa, Iowa, Clark spent ten minutes in each of her chorus rehearsals students telling them about composers or helping them recognize the stylistic features of the work that made it possible to place it in its correct historical context.
_	Whitburn later said she was "particularly proud" of the storyline and all the work that went into it.
_	It was in the Vatican, and with the assistance of Battista, that Bartolocci received his preparation for the work that was to give him lasting fame in the world of Jewish bibliography; and it was at the Vatican and its subsidiary libraries that he obtained his chief materials.
_	In May 2016, Khaimov was a recipient of TIMESLedger Newspapers "Queens Impact Award" honoring borough's unsung heroes and recognizing them for the work that they do behind the scenes as volunteers and professionals to make life better for people in Queens.
_	In some cases this can lead to something happening to the work that was not originally intended, such as the release of Franz Kafka's unfinished writings by Max Brod when Kafka had wished for them to be destroyed.
_	Most homes had their own ceramic kilns, baking ovens, and work centers, indicating that almost all of the work that needed to be done to maintain human existence at the Neolithic standard of living could be done within each household in the community.
_	Ryabenkiy felt interested in the work that the company was doing and applied there for a job.
_	Both Atul and Benares have been awarded a number of accolades including Atul receiving an Honorary Doctorate Degree from University of Southampton to recognise the work that he has contributed to the culinary industry.
_	The first Cavendish Professor was the then relatively obscure James Clerk Maxwell, who had yet to complete the work that would make him the most renowned physicist of the nineteenth century.
_	Upon completion of the work that required 8 months of arduous and meticulous work, "La Pichona", possibly one of the few vehicles of similar characteristics that are still in Argentina, was deposited in a square on January 8, 2011, between Bernal and Hipólito Yrigoyen streets of the city of Carmen de Patagones province of Buenos Aires.
_	Painted while Stuart was living in London, it was the work that first brought the artist broad recognition.
_	If he is talented, he allows us to glimpse the truth of the work that is in itself a thing of genius and that is reflected in him.
_	Although women were paid for the work that they performed, their wages were among the lowest in the cannery.
_	Alexander Rothman, editor-in-chief of "Ink Brick", has written, "I call the work that I make and publish 'comics poetry.'
_	Between 1886 and 1888 "capitaine de vaisseau" de Beaumont's naval division hunted down the pirates who still infested Along Bay and most of the Delta coasts and completed the work that Admiral Amédée Courbet had begun in 1884.
_	The document continued to outline the work that was to be supported by this aid (studies of the area, recording of monuments, new excavations, plus relocation of existing monuments away from the rising water to higher safer locations).
_	How this is done varies, depending on the work that the rogue trader is involved in, but in all cases, hidden cameras are used to record everything, while either a trade or legal expert is brought in to view the recorded footage and provide their opinions, thoughts and criticism over what they see being done, including if they suspect a trader is lying to a customer about something that is untrue, questioning what a trader is doing on a job, revealing what something should really cost that a trader is overpricing, and if a trader is doing something illegal that they shouldn't be doing.
_	The nucleus of the volume is a so-called „Social Indicator Table“ („Sozialindikatorentableau“) with several hundred indicators which were quantified in the work that followed.
_	Then, at the age of forty-nine, Makuzu wrote "Mukashibanashi", the work that is she best known for today.
_	Although parts date from the 13th and 14th centuries the interior, as it is seen today, shows the work that was carried out in 1847 when the south, west and north walls were rebuilt except a portion east from the Lady Chapel.
_	After his recovery, Bennett looked afresh at the situation and the conviction came to him that he should take up the work that Gurdjieff had started at the Prieuré in 1923 and been forced to abandon.
_	This was mailed to supporters in the United States and included monthly reports of the work that was being accomplished.
_	Some funding organizations in Australia are getting behind the work that Buzz Off is doing with the IDPs.
_	Published in 1903, this paper expands on the work that Gates did with Ernest Rutherford and Harriet Brooks.
_	Alan's two sons published a book on the work that he had undertaken at the Century 21 Studios, back in the mid 1960s.
_	The show runs for a number of days, and two (nominal) prizes are awarded: the People's Choice Award goes to the work that gets the most audience votes, while the Robot Choice Award is decided on by the artists themselves.
_	Add to that the linguistic grace of a Chinese brush painting...a major voice doing the work that had to be done"
_	The "Prophetiae" is the work that introduced the character of Merlin (Merlinus), as he later appears in Arthurian legend.
_	Despite the popularity of his Yogi Ramacharaka and Swami Bhakta Vishita series, the work that Atkinson produced under his third Hindu-sounding pseudonym, Swami Panchadasi, failed to capture a wide general audience.
_	The day before, John Whitton, Engineer-in-Charge for the New South Wales Railways, inspected the track and was reportedly extremely pleased at the excellence of the work that was 'unsurpassed, if even equalled, by any other portion of the existing railways'.
_	If the reciprocation does occur and the employee feels that he or she is being appreciated and respected for the work that he or she is doing, the POS is increased.
_	Eusebius of Caesarea later made his own summary as well, but he used a version of the work that differed from the one Africanus used.
_	Glass commented on his use of polyphony in the work that "The great experiments of polytonality carried out in the 1930s and 40s show that there's still a lot of work to be done in that area.
_	The book was edited, enhanced and then republished in the work that made him most famous, "Under the tent" (1888).
_	On March 8, 2016, Kris Naudus reported on Engadget that Coleco Holdings announced they had withdrawn their name and all Coleco branding from the project, stating: "Retro has decided that the work that they have created is not sufficient to demonstrate at this time.
_	Since individual differences have a long history in explaining human behavior and the different ways in which individuals respond to similar events and circumstances, these factors allow the organization to determine if an applicant has the competence to effectively and successfully do the work that the job requires.
_	“Mr. Brandeis is perfectly infatuated with the work that you have done along the lines of Zionism.
_	IDW released a remastered edition of the work that featured expanded art by Kaluta, and Moyer's new color art and designs.
_	At that time the work that computers could perform was limited by their lack of real memory storage capacity.
_	But Stanislavski eventually came to the conclusion that the theatre was not the place for such experiments, as it distracted from much of the work that needed to be done.
_	In August 1940 Blackett became scientific adviser to Lieutenant General Sir Frederick Pile, Commander in Chief of Anti-Aircraft Command and thus began the work that resulted in the field of study known as operational research (OR).
_	So a vertical slice can be defined as "the sum of the work that has to be done in every layer that is involved in getting a specific feature working."
_	The relationships between the tribes have become calm since the work that Tootie has done with changing the traditions of the Mardi Gras Indians.
_	As with any hysteretic process, the area inside the magnetization curve during one cycle represents the work that is performed on the material by the external field in reversing the magnetization, and is dissipated as heat.
_	He published the first volume of "Theatrum Scotiae" in 1693, but sales were poor and he applied to the Government for a grant to proceed with a continuation of the work that was to be called "Scotia Ilustrata".
_	Coleman “repeatedly assured employees that they would be paid for the work that they performed,” the lawsuit said.
_	The editor was so impressed with the work that he wanted to return the book to print.
_	The video explained the work that goes into making content videos, as well shooting "My Drunk Kitchen" videos and meeting up with fans all over Canada and the United States.
_	His closest friends were so unsure about parts of the work that they did not say anything to him.
_	Much of the work that was accomplished in the late 1930s was done by Civilian Conservation Corps labor, particularly the landscaping, which involved the transplantation of native vegetation into areas that had been disturbed by construction.
_	Despite admitting throughout the work that he very regularly used EPO, testosterone pills and patches, and autologous blood transfusions (all banned practices), Hamilton staunchly opposed the sanction, since he had never used the blood of another person.
_	They can however ask other non-striking employees to do the work that the strikers normally do.
_	The concept of the "middle way" says that time should be divided between working towards consumption and meditation and the optimal allocation between these two activities will be when some meditation is utilized to lower the desire for consumption and to be satisfied with lesser consumption and the work that it involves.
_	The fishing museum in Niechorze shows the life of a fisherman in Niechorze, showing how he goes about in his daily life and the work that he does.
_	The single is accredited to Jon McClure, Ed Cosens and Alan Smyth, acknowledging the work that Smyth did towards the demo of the song.
_	Every time I encounter these paintings, it's never the frothy sense of loathing that wins me over, but the undeniable, laugh-out-loud funny humor of them all, an aspect of the work that no doubt has the capacity to elevate them even further into that stratosphere of the imaginary world beyond."
_	Ascension attempted to erase the work that Wraith's equation had done to aid humankind in progression, allowing them to develop on their terms.
_	There was a division between the work the men did and the work that the women did.
_	In 2012 local resident Jean Gilbert was voted in as the North Ayrshire Citizen of the Year in recognition for all the work that Jean and her team have done to enhance the social life and surroundings of Burnhouse, Greenhills and Barrmill.
_	Copley's invitation to Michael Asher to launch his first American solo show in her space resulted in the work that the gallery may be best known for, the 1974 Installation where Asher removed the separating wall between the exhibition space and the back room storage and office areas.
_	Detailed work models are also created in order to understand the different aspects of the work that matter for design.
_	There are some parts of the work that contain matter of considerable suggestive value to those having to do with running cost accounts.
_	And he wish that there was enough time, energy, and financial resources to do all the work that needs to be done.
_	Being new and revolutionary, word of Polhem's work reached the reigning king, Charles XI who was so impressed with the work that he assigned him to improve Sweden's main mining operation; the Falun Copper mine.
_	It is the first of its kind in the whole of CIS region and has been very much appreciated by the scholars and academicians for the depth and the quality of the work that is being conducted by her work.
_	All of the work that the artist created before 1989 has been destroyed.
_	Other critics have stated that the quality the work that he produced varied.
_	She wrote of her work: "There is a theme throughout the work that I write...about childhood and the sins of the father, the sins of the mother, and how people take on the very thing they don’t like about their parents and they become them.
_	After three phone calls spread out over several months the appellant's wife spoke to the respondents; she said there were several problems with the work that they had done, and she would only pay £300 of the £482 owed.
_	In 2005, her family and friends in the UK founded a charity to raise funds to support the work that she had started.
_	The Home Secretary, Theresa May, said that "... we should look to make sure that the work that was done in relation to the Waterhouse inquiry did cover everything that it needed to cover."
_	Mary also threw herself into the work that her husband had started with the abolitionists.
_	Influenced by the work that produced the book and personal experiences, Shusterman’s attention moved from analytic philosophy to pragmatism.
_	Weston died within less than a year of the passing of the act, but he had so far expedited the work that ten out of the fourteen miles were completed, though at an expenditure much exceeding the original estimate.
_	Brazelton's impetus for the book was to generate a tangible version of the work that went into "Theater Hopper" for himself.
_	Weil’s first major publication, as well as the work that treats the most thoroughly the theoretical aspect of Weil’s philosophy, is the "Logique de la philosophie".
_	While referring to "Assassin's Creed", he said that despite his age, he was "blown away" by the work that was put in by the videogame industry to make their work more historically authentic.
_	Usually, Ernest Flagg is credited with some of the work that emerged from their partnership, including, the Singer Building (the world’s tallest building from 1908-1909), the Corcoran Gallery of Art in Washington, D.C., the Washington State Capitol and the Sheldon Library at St. Paul's School (Concord, New Hampshire).
_	The hosts would frequently talk about him, and the work that he did for the show, including reading and selecting scripts for the Three Page Challenge.
_	Viollet-le-Duc praised the work that he had done in difficult circumstances in Meaux and recommended that he be decorated for his services to the arts.
_	Martin led the work that developed early partnerships with Internet companies such as eBay.
_	On returning to England in 1856, Brewer started on the work that was to become "Brewer's Dictionary of Phrase and Fable."
_	This is a way of laying out the work that needs to be done to deliver value to customers.
_	Another result of the coup was that the work that had been done by British intelligence with the anti-Axis government of Cvetković and Maček was lost.
_	As part of his interest in this area, he met with the Dalai Lama who was so intrigued by the work that Doty had begun that he spontaneously made a personal donation of $150,000 which was soon thereafter followed by donations of over $2m.
_	The class had a short life as most of the work that they had been built for soon disappeared with the branch lines and the introduction of DMU services on shorter routes.
_	Such was the work that it did, that the new Labour government funded the WVS from central government funds.
_	Kim Jong-il says in the work that "Juche" is not simply a creative application of Marxism–Leninism, but "a new era in the development of human history".
_	Interacting soil and pollutant chemicals truly account for the work that can be completed by these microorganisms.
_	The factory-oriented jobs were very specific, and a child was a perfect candidate for the work that was necessary.
_	This involves the student submitting a series of essays to the Profession detailing the work that he or she has performed.
_	She ensured the purpose of her order was to continue the work that Carbonell herself did and this involved teaching catechism as well as home visitation for the sick.
_	Husserl argues in the work that it is possible to have an intellectual intuition of them, which occurs when an object is articulated as having certain features or relationships, and relates the formal structure of categorical objects to the grammatical parts of language.
_	After graduation he was posted to the 1st New York Engineer District but soon obtained leave to assist Hines with a special study of navigation on the Rhine and Danube Rivers on behalf of the League of Nations, essentially a continuation of the work that the two men had done in 1920.
_	By early 1891 he was declaring that he could not finish the work that year, but in May he expressed some small optimism, which by mid-June, had turned into:
_	The term "transformational development" refers to the work that Food for the Hungry staff and community members do to achieve mutual transformation and advance and accelerate measurable well-being improvements for the most vulnerable.
_	Determined to continue the work that Poopsnagle had originally begun, Garcia traveled to Australia in a hot air balloon in search of his old friend.
_	Roger Lewis of the "Financial Times" said of the work that "If this book is thought of less as a memoir than as a symphonic poem about post-war England and Englishness - well, then it is a masterpiece."
_	That said, most of the work that has been done on the role of gut flora in the gut-brain axis has been conducted in animals, including the highly artificial germ-free mice.
_	On June 21, 2012, Bryson resigned because, "the work that [Commerce employees] do to help America’s entrepreneurs and businesses build our economy and create jobs is more important now than ever and I have come to the conclusion that I need to step down to prevent distractions from this critical mission."
_	This was due in the main part to its principal coach, James Williams, whose reputation in the fencing world is second to none, and the work that he has done with the club, and the community.
_	Also, it lessens the chance of human error by detecting MLS from an entire image set compared to selecting the single most important slice, which allows the computer to do the work that was once manually done.
_	These acknowledgments by the Bay Guardian and the San Francisco Board of Supervisors are representative of the community’s validation of the work that is done at the clinic and its belief that the operating principles of the clinic are to be respected.
_	In 1929 Nix co-authored a book titled "Oklahombres" with Gordon Hines, detailing much of the work that went into bringing the gang down, in addition to the hunting down of many other outlaws, including the Jennings Gang.
_	In 1817 he submitted to Krochmal his first critical study, entitled "Ha-Mazkir," and Krochmal was so favorably impressed with the work that he offered to contribute toward the expense of publication.
_	The Countryside Agency has awarded Carterton Beacon Status for the work that the Fast Forward team is undertaking on the regeneration of the town centre.
_	In addition he had the additional responsibility of serving as a Bilingual School Psychologist system wide, As my tenure in Project MAS was coming to an end, Mr. Natividad Marques wrote a piece on the work that we had performed during that year.
_	Rogan became the first youth arts worker, and began working more extensively in the community, ensuring that young people who would not normally attend the youth theatre were able to benefit from the work that went on there.
_	Among the work that has been done, however, Berkmen and Cavallo (2007) do not find evidence that more active intervention in foreign exchange markets (i.e., more fixing) leads to higher liability dollarization.
_	The prize was presented by Prime Minister Bob Hawke, who was so impressed with the work that he used it for the Hawke family Christmas cards.
_	"Solveig Dommartin and I had written the story of our film together, and we thought that we only had the right to enter into such a sacred area like a person's dreams, if we would bring something into the work that was sacred to ourselves".
_	"To do the work that will put Fisk in the real leadership of Negro education, it will be necessary to strengthen the teaching staff, especially by the addition of highly trained, highly capable men to the Faculty.
_	It should also be noted that Shiba had no qualms with an unauthorized Chinese translation of the work that appeared in China, though the translator made serious changes to the plot like removing the anti-Manchu/pro-Han sections and seemed to have a limited command of Japanese language in and of itself.
_	The Bulgarian society truly appreciated the work that the American teachers were doing.
_	He was the organizer and main co-contributor to the work that resulted in the publishing of the "Atlasi dialektologjik i gjuhës shqipe" (Dialectical atlas of the Albanian language), "Dialektologjia shqiptare" (Albanian dialectics), both works of major importance.
_	He becomes so focused on the work that he misses the bus.
_	Even so, the community was taxed trying to perform all of the work that was necessary to keep up with the task.
_	Prior to any references to the kidnapping being added to Rohde's article in Wikipedia, a "Times" reporter, Michael Moss, made changes to the article to emphasize the work that Rohde had done, in such a way that Rohde would be seen by his captors as being sympathetic to Muslims.
_	Gaines retained all of the work that Kurtzman had done with EC as it was work made for hire.
_	However, one year later, in 1902, he finally paid everything back and was able to head to Japan with his family to continue the work that had been started by the Cowmans and Nakada.
_	Ken Tucker of "Entertainment Weekly" gave the book a "B+", writing, "you have to admire all the work that went into this unauthorized history."
_	Walt Disney, however, was not impressed with the work that was being done on the film.
_	Though the artist is somewhat limited in the size of the work that can be created, a great level of detail can be achieved with this technique.
_	In 1878, Ferdinand de Saussure, then a 21-year-old student at the University of Leipzig, published his "Mémoire sur le système primitif des voyelles dans les langues indo-européennes", 'Dissertation on the original system of vowels in the Indo-European languages', the work that founded the laryngeal theory.
_	If the estimate is accepted, the repair is completed and Montblanc will provide a one-year repair warranty on the work that was done.
_	The new company continues the work that Crutchfield began as the Director of Opera for Bel Canto at Caramoor International Music Festival, a widely-heralded program which celebrated its twentieth and final season in 2017.
_	He became inspired by the work that actor Ernesto Blanco did on the play, and decided to take acting seriously, becoming a student at the prestigious Conservatorio de Arte Dramático, where some of Argentina's most famous actors have also graduated from.
_	Belvati reasoned that the work that requires service is the song.
_	Furthermore, Jang also states in a later part of the work that "I climbed to the peak of the island in order to see the boundaries of Japan, but no Japanese islands could be seen at all, and I cannot, therefore, fathom the distance to the border."
_	This described ENIAC and the work that Hartree had done on it.
_	CLAC has been providing financial aid to workers around the world for 25 through its solidarity locals, which are made up of CLAC by members who are not directly represented by the union but believe in the work that it does.
_	As for style, it was said that the heavy, monotonous, versification, the declamatory pieces and "Iphigénie en Tauride" language mistakes were saved by the energy and heat that animated all of the work that was printed several time (Paris, 1758, 1784, 1811, 1815, 1818, in-8°).
_	Brewer and several legitimate artists have countersued saying they had nothing to do with the work that they are being sued for.
_	And it's not relevant for the work that we do that we get money from Arab countries".
_	Those pages are the part of the work that is now most remembered.
_	At their first exhibition, held in April 1874, Monet exhibited the work that was to give the group its lasting name.
_	By this time, he had doubts about fundamental aspects of the work that went back to the earliest versions of the stories, and it seems that he felt the need to resolve these problems before he could produce the "final" version of "The Silmarillion".
_	“Mr. Brandeis is perfectly infatuated with the work that you have done along the lines of Zionism.
_	Stuart Bell featured in a film of the 2010 General Election entitled "ToryBoy The Movie" made by John Walsh, which explored the candidate’s selection process and the work that goes into an election campaign.
_	Miura stated that the work that had the biggest impact on his own is "Fist of the North Star".
_	It was there, during summers spent in a cabin studio in a steep wooded canyon with panoramic views of the Rocky Mountains, that Burr began to concentrate on the work that made him famous.
_	"The Watchtower" told Witnesses: "It is proper to cover over our arrangements for the work that God commands us to do.
_	The previously written "Valse-Scherzo" was the work that would be dedicated to Kotek.
_	Grove says of the work that its "orgiastic power, coruscating malice, sensuous desolation and extroverted swagger" make the symphony a tribute to Walton's tenacity and inventive facility.
_	But his brother Aegidius promised to complete his work when he was on the deathbed and accordingly Aegidius left his job and began to concentrate only on the work that his departed brother began.
_	At the close of the book Ghulam Ahmad has made an announcement to the effect that all those who would like to ask any questions or who have any objections against Islam, the Qur'an and the prophet Muhammad, or against himself (Ghulam Ahmad) or his claims or the work that he is doing, should write to him and seriously and sincerely ask for his answers.
_	Much of the work that Miller produced during this period is now lost.
_	In the Copyright Law of the United States, more specifically under 17 U.S.C 102, the work that is sought to be protected must satisfy the threshold for originality.
_	"I am committed to the work that I am doing at OPM," Archuleta told reporters.
_	This relates to the work that is done on both the local, national and international level in cooperation with other actors.
_	At the same time, “Thank you literature” became a result of the personality cult that Stalin had implemented and articles in women’s magazines would praise Stalin for the work that he had done for women.
_	In view of the foregoing, the work that was carried out on the semi-finished product is legitimate and does not give rise to suspicion."
_	Now Bajaur is completely free of Talibans because of the work that Brig Abid Mumtaz, Brig Zafar-Ul-Haq and all the brave soldiers who served with them.
_	He restored the choir and again continued the work that was interrupted in 1940.
_	In 1926 he essayed "Cavalleria rusticana" (the work that Basiola would perform most often at the Metropolitan) and "Rigoletto" with Marion Talley.
_	Lady Salusbury was so delighted with the work that she gave Repton a bonus of £50.
_	"This work is not for sissies," said Acumen Fund founder Jacqueline Novogratz in reference to the work that GPF members do in philanthropy and impact investing.
_	Regarding his work on the show, he told CraveOnline, "I'm very grateful for the work that I've been able to do in my life, but I can honestly tell you, this is the best usage of television I've ever been a part of to date."
_	Ellul addressed the members of the club and described the work that had been done, together with the objectives and future projects.
_	Genetic engineering proved to be a topic that thrust biotechnology into the public scene, and the interaction between scientists, politicians, and the public defined the work that was accomplished in this area.
_	Irby was to continue with the work that they had initiated for the rest of her life but Mackenzie became Lady Sebright.
_	This is the work that piqued the interest of CKNW Radio and led to another intriguing job offer.
_	The database developer should not be able to execute anything in production without an independent review of the documentation/code for the work that is being performed.
_	It was then sent for publication as the composer was so confident in the work that he did not play it until receiving the proofs.
_	After joining Alma White and the Pillar of Fire holiness church in Denver, Bartleman continued the work that became his lifelong mission – working with down-and-outs, alcoholics and wayward girls, mostly in inner city rescue missions.
_	The reason behind this behavior is because employees who work for non profits already have a passion for the work that they do.
_	As of January 2016, most of the work that has been done on the role of gut flora in the gut-brain axis had been conducted in animals, or characterizing the various neuroactive compounds that gut flora can produce, and studies with humans measuring differences between people with various psychiatric and neurological differences, or changes to gut flora in response to stress, or measuring effects of various probiotics (dubbed "psychobiotics in this context), had generally been small and could not be generalized; whether changes to gut flora are a result of disease, a cause of disease, or both in any number of possible feedback loops in the gut-brain axis, remained unclear.
_	According to Bishop Danylak, among those impressed by the work at the Vatican was the Pope Pius XII's confessor, Father (later Cardinal) Augustin Bea, who later wrote that he found the parts of the work that he had read "not only interesting and pleasing, but truly edifying".
_	After a period of four years in 2004, Key released their third and longest game "Clannad" where Maeda did a vast amount of the writing for the game; in all, Maeda put in around 75% of the work that went into the creation of "Clannad".
_	With respect to "luxury" living, they "live in homes that make it possible for them to continue the work that they do.
_	The E flags represent excellence and pride in the work that the community of York contributed.
_	"The bourgeoisie are compelled to work, but they have not the right to choose the work that they understand, and which best corresponds to their abilities.
_	I am not too frequently bothered by very burdensome tasks, but it is my duty to observe and supervise all the work that my Officers do.
_	The portrait of Gen. Ulysses S. Grant seems to have been the work that stirred uniform national interest and set Gutekunst apart from his contemporaries.
_	The book documented the work that produced in the Cranbrook studios during the 1980s, and it "probably sealed the reputation of the school" as a place where the visual qualities of the work, sometimes generated by a highly creative interpretation of theory, took precedence without regard to the "needs of the profession".
_	Much of the work that was done at the juvenile prison was based on a system of permaculture.
_	One part of a woman’s life was considered private which included the work that women did and how they were treated inside the home.
_	By declaring the work that women do as private, this then lowers their status in Peru being their work was not valued.
_	At their first exhibition, held in April 1874, Monet exhibited the work that was to give the group its lasting name, "Impression, Sunrise".
_	The court held that whilst the $9,500 - $10,000 in costs where not substantial in itself, that the inconvenience of the work that was entailed, met the standard required under either s 7 (4)(b)(I) or s7(4)(b)(ii).
_	Voorhees had this house built in 1871, and he supervised the work that was done by masons and carpenters.
_	Aventinus finished composing the history in 1523; the work that he compiled, "Annals of Bavaria", extends beyond Bavaria, drawing on numerous ancient and medieval sources.
_	order to raise important funds for the work that they do.
_	Individuals function autonomously, constantly interacting with each other to define the vision and aims, maintain a common understanding of requirements and monitor the work that needs to be done.
_	Located on the Plaza Julio de Caro, next to the Palais de Glace, located across Avenida Alvear, right next to the Plaza Intendente Alvear, exactly opposite the work that honors her son Torcuato de Alvear.
_	In 1806, the prefect Charles Ambroise de Caffarelli du Falga, disallowed the appropriations voted by the municipality for resumption of the work that had been interrupted.
_	In June 1945 the Air Council wrote to the Lords of the Admiralty expressing "their appreciation" of the work that had been done on the "rocket bomb".
_	The primary focus of the magazine, besides the fact that it was mostly based on Star Trek fandom, was the making of science fiction media - books, films, and television series - and the work that went into these creations.
_	At a time when graph theory was still a primitive subject, Tutte commenced the study of matroids and developed them into a theory by expanding from the work that Hassler Whitney had first developed around the mid 1930s.
_	"It’s been ultimately very rewarding because of the work that’s been done during the actual run of the play.
_	In addition to the work that Rogers did for Native American rights, she also campaigned and leveraged her social connections mid-20th century to have Native American art classified as "historic", which provided both protection and status.
_	In 1996, English won the Harold D. Lasswell Prize from the American Political Science Association for the work that he later used in writing "Russia and the Idea of the West: Gorbachev, Intellectuals, and the End of the Cold War".
_	L'engle shows how important families are in building and creating a person's views on the world and themselves, but also the work that it takes to be a family because it is not one mass thinking unanimously.
_	Prince Iaukea also received blessing from King Curtis Iaukea during a phone conversation with King Curtis telling him that "he was family" and that he enjoyed the work that Prince was doing.
_	The Pazo of Toixeriña is very well preserve, thanks to the work that the Friends of the Pazos have made.
_	But, now that this battle has been won, it faces a tricky problem: how can it sustain widespread interest when it no longer feels appropriate to describe the work that is shortlisted each year as 'shocking' or 'controversial'?"
_	Lovatts were contracted to the Great Central to execute contract number 2 on their extension line to London, East Leake to Aylestone, but the Corporation of Leicester insisted that those portions of the work that could delay or hinder the completion of their new water works at Swithland were to be executed by the main contractors for that job.
_	In November 1998, it was reported that the source of his income was the work that he performed as a freelance translator.
_	The wildlife hospital is not open for viewing, but visiting parties can learn about the work that takes place there during their trip.
_	His other awards include a Pew Fellowship in Conservation and Environment, the Naumann-Thienemann medal of the International Society of Limnology in 2007 for "research that has built bridges between ecological theory, ecosystem experiments, and management of complex limnological problems" and the work that "has elucidated the importance of the trophic cascade and regime shifts in the management of lakes", the G. Evelyn Hutchinson Award in 1999 from the American Society of Limnology and Oceanography, the Robert H. MacArthur Award in 2000 from the Ecological Society of America, the Excellence in Ecology Prize (ECI Prize)in 2000 from the Ecology Institute for limnetic ecology, and .
_	The work in all ways reveals Eberle’s growing social awareness and fearlessness to create the work that was important to her.
_	As late as 1802, "The Times" wrote of the work that "no modern composition is equal to it".
_	According to his own account, he missed out on the work that became Samuel Johnson's "Lives of the Poets" (1779–81).
_	Gardner recognized the work that public health nurses could do to lower the rate of infant mortality and improve the health of children.
_	Receiving the award from The Sugababes, he said how flattering it was to get an award that last year had gone to Paul McCartney, and that it was an honour to be chosen for the work that he'd done in the past.
_	He doesn't even acknowledge the work that she is doing without any rest in her life.
_	Because of the nature of the graduate thesis or dissertation having to be more narrow and more novel, the result of original research, these usually have a smaller proportion of the work that is cited from other sources, though the fact that they are lengthier may mean they still have total citations.
_	Astonishingly, considering the work that Rivers did in his relatively short lifetime, Seligman wrote in 1922 that "for many years he seldom worked for more than four hours a day".
_	It reveals "the work that actors do as they engage with some ensemble of activities (that may include new or changed ways of thinking, acting, and organizing) and by which means it becomes routinely embedded in the matrices of already existing, socially patterned, knowledge and practices".
_	The nature of the work that the FA undertook, inevitably brought the agency to the notice of Heinrich Himmler, who attempted on his own initiative to gain control of the unit and its activity.
_	Eighty-five percent of these researchers say that they have continued the work that they started under their AFAR-sponsored grant.
_	Site preparation is the work that is done before a forest area is regenerated.
_	There is also a regular fans' forum meeting with chairman Ian Lenagan and the current head coach to discuss the latest issues concerning the club and the work that is being done behind the scenes.
_	On 10 June 2011, Kent County Council organised a walk of the trackbed from Gills Green to demonstrate the work that would be needed to convert the trackbed for use by walkers and cyclists.
_	However, any movement of a positive charge into a region of higher voltage requires external work to be done against the field of the electric force, which is equal to the work that the electric field would do in moving that positive charge the same distance in the opposite direction.
_	Giuliano da Maiano began the work that year and continued to direct construction until his death in 1490, when the building was substantially completed and partially occupied.
_	The book was published anonymously in 1872; Ruiz de Burton feared that if it became known that a non-native English speaker had written the work that it would undergo greater scrutiny for grammatical errors.
_	The reasons for these differences may be differences in biology or in the work that women are performing.
_	Matthew Boulton remarked in 1770 how "by the many mechanical contrivances and extensive apparatus wh we are possess'd of, our men are enabled to do from twice to ten times the work that can be done without the help of such contrivances".
_	The letter added resonance to the work that the European Commission's Information Society and Media Directorate had been engaged in for over a decade, with programmes such as Telematics for Libraries.
_	Rhoads had run chemical weapons programs for the US army in World War II, and had been involved in the work that led to the discovery that nitrogen mustards could potentially be used as cancer drugs.
_	(i) Montgomery's pair correlation conjecture and the work that initiated from it,
_	Needing the work that the O'Driscolls can provide, Aidan reluctantly agrees.
_	A compositional scheme is used within the work that associates flat keys with the feminine (the female protagonist Alcina and her attendants) and sharp keys with the masculine (the male protagonist Ruggiero and the other male roles).
_	Bridget Tan has also been personally recognized for the work that she did as part of HOME, and received a Hero Acting to End Modern-Day Slavery Award from then United States Secretary of State Hillary Clinton at a June 2011 ceremony surrounding the release of the Department of State's 2011 Trafficking in Persons Report.
_	This is the version of the work that is read today.
_	The Bishop of Palencia opposed the work that was printed in his diocese.
_	A "legacy document" has been published to show the work that it had undertaken.
_	For the TCDT, the crew also received a briefing from NASA engineers, outlining the work that had been carried out on "Discovery" during the STS-133 processing flow.
_	Despite this, he conducted the work that month in Berlin, with Eugen d'Albert as soloist.
_	He also suggested that it was the work that led Pope Paul VI to publicly condemn Marcuse in 1969.
_	However, Louis was so pleased with the work that he kept the original and commissioned a copy to be sent to his grandson.
_	However, there are themes within the work that raise fundamental questions about its equity, efficiency and longevity, notably its long-term use of fossil fuels and the problems of sustainability that face humanity now; the damaging effects of imperialism; and the danger of government and public interest being stymied by the strong private interests of the free market.
_	"I want you to know that I am open to receiving and considering all information about Garabandal, and would like to continue—as long as our Holy Father wishes me to serve as Apostolic Administrator—the work that my brothers at the Bishopric have already done in reference to this subject.
_	In 1990 the Laguna Art Museum organized a retrospective of Segalove’s work titled "Ilene Segalove: Why I Got Into TV and Other Stories", encompassing much of the work that she had made since the 1970s.
_	It has been described as being more important than the work that Xue Juzheng created and upon its discovery "Xue Juzheng's earlier history was largely forgotten and nearly lost to the world."
_	In Foucault's opinion the modern concept of population, as opposed to the ancient Antiquity and medieval version of "populousness" which has in its roots going as far back as the time period of the Book of Numbers in the Old testament Bible and the work that it sustained both in political theory and practice certainly does so; or, at least, the construction of the concept population is central to the creation of new orders of knowledge, new objects of intervention, new forms of subjectivity.
_	In 1919, Gabriela Mistral published "Desolación", the work that won her the Nobel Prize in Literature in 1945.
_	But, despite all the work that he had done, Cernadas would not become a major international super-star until 2002, when he flew to Peru to act in "Bésame Tonto" ("Kiss me, Fool"), alongside Gianella Neyra.
_	By 1989, the work that the company had been doing in the west coast had secured as second production facility there, along with moves to seek out clients and opportunities outside the automotive industry, and experimented with developing its consulting capabilities.
_	Peru's Challenge have received worldwide recognition for their work and have been featured on the Australian hit travel show "Getaway" showcasing the work that they have completed and are undertaking in the rural communities of Cuzco.
_	Amongst their global acknowledgment, local news networks have covered the work of previous volunteers as the work that Peru's Challenge has done and is doing in Peru has had a universal effect on anyone who participates.
_	This was the beginning of the work that led to the groundswell of support for the UNC Political Leader and later became the strongest support base for Dookeran and the New Politics.
_	However, his main contribution is in supervising the work that culminated in solving the crystal structure of plant PSI by his students Adam Ben-Shem and later Alexey Amunts.
_	The show follows the daily life of the Metro SWAT officers and the work that they have to deal with.
_	This program is responsible for planning the work that will fulfill the public policy of the Fire Corps, provisions of its organic law, the Governor's executive orders and other mechanisms to safeguard life and property.
_	ASLEF aims to increase basic pay so the "overtime culture" is reduced or eliminated, in the hope that more jobs will be created to cover the work that is not covered by overtime.
_	Without any new evidence, it cannot be said for certain, but given the fact that the work that we have is only 20 lines suggests that the writing board is a fraction of the original work.
_	This inevitably leads to a range of restrictions entailed by the specificity of the work that can otherwise be found in all the intelligence services in the democratic states.
_	A person of the same name wrote a work "Ointments and Chaplets" (Περὶ Μύρων καὶ Στεφάνων) quoted by Athenaeus, and another, quoted by the same author, "On Venomous Animals" (Περὶ Θηρίων), which is possibly the work that is several times referred to by Pliny.
_	Joachim played the work that evening, with Clara Schumann at the piano.
_	It was her distinguished career in local government and the work that she did for children which brought her the recognition of a seat in the House of Lords as a recognised authority on the subject.
_	effort of all of the work that they do, developing a history of the effort they have put into
_	The Blackdown team received recognition at the JavaOne conference in 1998 for the work that the team had been doing.
_	Dr. Sheffield thinks it better for the work that I return home now than wait a little longer and make my class reunion in 1902.
_	The Campus has also obtained the “Cumplimiento Ambiental” reward, thanks to the work that has developed the Physical floor Direction.
_	The principle is simply that each partner receives a share of the partnership profits up to a certain amount, with any additional profits being distributed to the partner who was responsible for the "origination" of the work that generated the profits.
_	In 2008-2009, Dr.Levich summarized the work that lasted for many years in the field of turbulence, which might be one of the most important discoveries in modern physics.
_	He recognized the work that was yet to come, saying, "We’ve got to rebuild America's infrastructure -- from roads to high-speed internet -- that will help connect Native communities to other parts of the country and other parts of the world.
_	Regional Forums are Bible agencies who collaborate within a specific region of the world and have meetings to determine the work that each organization will do within that region.
_	Rating the album three stars for New Release Today, Jonathan J. Francesco describes, "This is a strong introduction, and here's hoping the work that follows builds on this foundation and helps make their stance filling the rock and roll void a long-term proposition."
_	In addition to the work that the band does on the field, Houser believes the band can and should use its fame and manpower to help give back to the community.
_	One reason for this is that the Japanese population was not as prominent as the Chinese one in numbers and the work that they did, which included the construction of factories, bridges and other infrastructure was viewed favorably.
_	Her major international breakthrough came however in 2010 with the production of the work that has become known as the “700-Wall” – a 700 square-meter work along the train line between Berlin and Halle.
_	The film grew out of the work that a white musician, Graeme Isaac, was doing with disaffected Aboriginal youths in Adelaide, South Australia, in the late 1970s.
_	Living at Dundonnell and later in the Summer Isles, Fraser Darling began the work that was to mark him as a naturalist-philosopher of original turn of mind and great intellectual drive.
_	He praised the initiative for the work that has been done and presented TCH with a notable gift to help develop the facilities.
_	This is the work that Óscar has been doing".
_	Julie Barak emphasizes the significance of "one other stylistic idiosyncrasy of the work that adds to the sophistication of [Alvarez's] artistry" as there is a marked transition from third to first person narration for each girl in the last section of the novel.
_	Another explanation suggests that Michelangelo's treatment of the subject was influenced by his passion for Dante's "Divina Commedia": so well-acquainted was he with the work that when he went to Bologna he paid for hospitality by reciting verses from it.
_	In August 2010, Riot filed an opposing trademark for "DotA", in order to "protect the work that dozens of authors have done to create the game".
_	In 1950, Oberth moved on to Italy, where he completed some of the work that he had begun at the WASAG organization for the new Italian Navy.
_	Later over coffee Jacob and Joshua talk about the work that's left to do on the album and about preparing for the HRC performance.
_	In the years during and following WWII, several innovative scientists immigrated to the U.S. from Europe, such as Enrico Fermi, who came from Italy in 1938 and led the work that produced the world's first self-sustaining nuclear chain reaction.
_	By 1910 Kneen had completed "A Grammar of the Manx Language", the work that was to later be called his "great work."
_	During his time at Toccoa Falls College, Embry and his family searched extensively through Northeast Georgia for property to begin the work that would eventually become Shepherds Hill Academy.
_	Maybe that's the point—we are talking narcissism—but despite the work that went into her, we can't take her to heart."
_	All the sections have leaders, they carry out and help the youths organize all the work that the youth group does.
_	Sibbes believed the Second Coming was necessary to complete the work that Christ had begun.
_	There is preparation before the event and cleanup after the event as well as all of the work that needs performed during the actual event.
_	Men tend to do the work that earns high wages whereas women do the work that is considered domestic.
_	Thomas says in an interview about his art work, “I see the work that I make as asking questions.
_	MacArthur, however, was already "overloaded" with the work that needed to be done in Japan, so he ordered the commander of Operation "Blacklist Forty", Lieutenant General John R. Hodge, to maintain a "harsh" occupation of Korea.
_	It took advantage of the Theater's multiple vantages and high ceilings in order to create encounters with the work that go beyond the single-perspective of a wall-mounted or wheatpasted work.
_	Mirsky saw "The History of a Town" (a sort of parody of Russian history, concentrated in the microcosm of a provincial town, whose successive governors are transparent caricatures of Russian sovereigns and ministers, and whose very name is representative of its qualities) as the work that summed up the achievement of Saltykov's first period.
_	His most notable work, however, may have been as director of photography for the 1977 television production of Tchaikovsky's Christmas ballet "The Nutcracker" starring Mikhail Baryshnikov, a now-classic interpretation of the work that has become a television, VHS, and DVD favorite.
_	It was just something they see in the work that they really liked, and responded to."
_	Ben yells at his younger self for not appreciating all the work that Phyllis did.
_	The critics argue that because of this lack of innovation within the work that the overall album falls short of expectations but is still enjoyable.
_	He was passionate about West Texas and the work that he did...
_	The core group met every other week for ten years, talking openly and honestly about the work that they were doing, and the things they were learning from and with their patients, in Jean Baker Miller's living room.
_	The following year she left for Rawalpindi to continue the work that McLaren had begun.
_	The pianist Caroline Montigny-Rémaury had asked for a short piano and orchestra piece, but she never played the work that Franck composed in the summer of 1884.
_	Additionally, Patagonia will be able to leverage the work that the .green gTLD is doing to connect with that community and make it a known quantity amongst consumers who want to support "green" initiatives."
_	Adding to the disappointment, Pietsch was assigned from the start to "interiors," which meant dashboards—sketches and more sketches of instruments and instrument panels, reminiscent of the work that had "bored him to death" back at Ford in the late 1940s.
_	Artistry of the Mentally Ill: a contribution to the psychology and psychopathology of configuration () is a 1922 book by psychiatrist Hans Prinzhorn, known as the work that launched the field of psychiatric art.
_	I feel I have a duty to perform, and trust that, after my death, others will be found to carry on the work that I have started."
_	Unlike Pico, Valla had little influence on his time and place through the work that Copenhaver has studied, the "Dialectical Disputations", whose main target is Peter of Spain's "Summary of Logic", written in the thirteenth century but still Europe's leading textbook of logic when Valla wrote his "Disputations".
_	The 2007 season was partly devoted to finishing the work that had to be halted in the 2006 season, as well as preparing the site for excavation the following season.
_	By 1920, Oregon had of paved roads and of plank roads for a population of 783,389 and, by 1932, the work that had been started on the Oregon Coast Highway (also known as U.S. Route 101) in 1914 was completed, except for five bridges, which meant greater responsibility for the division.
_	To the sides of the tower are plaques which depict the work that the students did, such as factory work, female students sewing, or showing students working to increase food production.
_	Former first lady Imelda Marcos was so impressed by the work that she brought the entire collection to the Malacañan Palace for the viewing of her then guest of honor David Rockefeller.
_	Though, due to climate and weather constraints, women may have done the work that needed attention at the time.
_	The nature of the work that slaves did had a direct effect on aspects of slaves' lives such as life expectancy and family formation.
_	Heywood's own brother-in-law (Ezra's brother, Samuel Heywood), disliked the work that Ezra and Angela were doing so immensely that he foreclosed on their house in September 1878 while Ezra was in prison.
_	Seeing that he and the few clergy co-operating with him could not do the work that needed to be done, Wesley was led, as early as 1739, to approve local preachers.
_	Aristotle closes the "Nicomachean Ethics" therefore by announcing a programme of study in politics, including the collecting of studies of different constitutions, and the results of this programme are generally assumed to be contained in the work that exists today and is known as the "Politics".
_	Some stations stay with the same class of boat and others are upgraded to the new improved versions of what they have had, or downgraded to a more suitable class to carry out the work that they have been doing with the old boat.
_	He also said in a later interview that "the contact and the dialogue with all those artists and the work that took place was just invaluable."
_	She also delivered the speech, "Now We Can Begin" following the ratification of the Nineteenth Amendment, outlining the work that needed to be done in the political and economic spheres to achieve gender equality.
_	The series follows the patients for days, weeks and months, with their stay in the ICU and other parts of the Alfred Hospital and the work that the medical and nursing staff perform each day.
_	In 2012 the ISSF lead research cruises in the West Indian Ocean and the Western and Central Pacific Ocean expanding on the work that was done at-sea in 2011.
_	In 1920 he became Associate Professor ("außerordentlicher Professor") and in 1921 appeared the work that established him as an independent philosophical thinker, "Grundzüge einer Metaphysik der Erkenntnis" ("Foundation of a Metaphysics of Knowledge").
_	Yet this was the time when she began the work that would eventually bring her fame and material comfort, if not wealth.
_	During this period, there were no copies of the work that belonged to members of the Parlement or the university community.
_	Thus, my work with Ruth Manning-Sanders has proved most satisfying, and the twenty-five books we have done together contain much of the work that I feel personally happiest with."
_	Prabhulinga Leelai, the work that the following translation comes from, chronicles the life and deeds of Allama Prabhu, a 12th-century Lingayata saint and teacher.
_	The energy in the radiation is provided by the work that accelerates the charge.
_	Fabian’s vision is to continue the work that Bob Marley started, and spreading the gospel of reggae music and unity worldwide.
_	Burr is believed to have coined the term "iconographer" to describe the work that he did developing iconographic schemes, decorative themes and inscriptions for a large number and variety of public buildings in the United States.
_	To do so, he tries to sabotage the work that Merle had allotted to Jeannie (who Darryl greatly dislikes) while Merle himself was addressing the queries by the others.
_	"Berserk" creator Kentaro Miura has named "Fist of the North Star" as the work that has had the biggest impact on his own.
_	One day Eréndira is so tired from all the work that she falls sleep without extinguishing the candles.
_	Some critics felt that the concerto was old-fashioned; Peter Heyworth wrote that there was little in the work that would have startled an audience in the year the met its iceberg (1912).
_	All of the work that she did later in life serves as proof for the education that she did receive in spite of any limitations that were placed on her due to her sex.
_	He acknowledged the essential nature of mapping for military operations, the work that the Survey Corps did for conflicts around the world and also for the nation building of Australia.
_	For example, the story closely follows Ryan in his advanced physics class, where tension is created between him and another student, Lindsay, who presumes that Ryan will be useless as a lab partner, who thus prevents him from contributing to the work that must be submitted.
_	By the early 1950s, Palmer had married Rev. Lee Chupco and was speaking on behalf of the Methodist church of the work that she and her husband did among Oklahoma's Indian tribes.
_	He had an immense influence on the scientific classification of birds, and the work that Sibley initiated has substantially altered our understanding of the evolutionary history of modern birds.
_	His major published work, "The Individual Delinquent", detailed the work that he did with factors and is considered to be his best-known work.
_	In those cases, HDC sponsors the work that would otherwise be done by a community group.
_	She insists on doing the work that her father has assigned him, and freely admits her naivety to him before swearing her love for him.
_	Battiste has been honored multiple times with awards for the work that she has done.
_	The boys were divided into two watches, when one watch was in school the other watch would be doing the work that sailors must do.
_	In a move that remains controversial to the present day (though it has not been closely examined by film historians), Paramount took over the Fleischer studio completely and brought it under the fold of their own studio, renaming it Famous Studios and continuing the work that the Fleischers began.
_	Lala was so esteemed in the work that she did that it filled Galleries in Rome.
_	Budgeted at Cr$ 1,200,000.00, currency of the time, the work that was started in the Government Jose Fragelli, was finally completed in 1976, now in administration José Garcia Neto.
_	The train was awarded the highly prestigious Decoration of the Red Flag in honor of the work that it and its crew performed during the civil war.
_	In Thessaloniki the situation was tougher, since all the work that had been done to improve the site was now useless, due to relocation.
_	Around this time, he started the work that would culminate in the "Logique de la philosophie" as a reflection around the role that philosophical categories and discursive rationality play in history.
_	Koyré was also to be the director of the work that he defended at the Ecole Pratique des Hautes Etudes “La critique de l’astrologie chez Pic de la Mirandole” which extended his work on the Renaissance, in order to have an equivalence degree in France.
_	At the age of 10, soon after entering the gymnasium, he encountered a copy of Conrad Gessner's "Historiae Animalium", the work that first sparked his interest in natural history.
_	Though Allen's work influenced Students for a Democratic Society (SDS) and sectors of the "new left" and paved the way for "white privilege" and "race as social construct" study, and though he appreciated much of the work that followed, he also raised important questions about developments in those areas.
_	Faust wrote, "There is a quirky humor underlying the work that reverses without warning into a strange and cutting malevolence".
_	As a result of the work that NMDE did on the "Tahoe" site from 1999 up to their dives in 2002, "Tahoe" became the first maritime site in Nevada to be listed in the National Register of Historic Places.
_	The setpoint itself may be generated by an external system, such as a PLC or other computer system, so that it continuously varies depending on the work that the robotic arm is expected to do.
_	They tend to place more focus on initiating structure within the group, setting standards and objectives, identifying roles, defining responsibilities and standard operating procedures, proposing solutions to problems, monitoring compliance with procedures, and finally, emphasizing the need for productivity and efficiency in the work that needs to be done.
_	Returning to the work that had been suspended in 1968, Hübschmannová published the first Romani-Czech/Czech-Romani Pocket Dictionary, with Hana Šebková and Anna Žigová in 1991.
_	However, the only significant component of the work that is presently authoritative is his system of lunar nomenclature.
_	Despite this, there are also a number of places within the work that require ensemble playing, for example, the famous 13-bar passage in the finale in which the oboe plays in common time against a 6/8 accompaniment.
_	This practice, and the work that resulted from it, led to a performative collaboration with Hunter Reynolds, "The Banquet", (a loose reinterpretation and restaging of Meret Oppenheim’s Spring Feast).
_	The employees can select a place of work that is best suited to them and to the work that they do.
_	They were closely supervised by Lilanga, and began to take over part of the work that Lilanga could no longer easily do by himself.
_	By this time, he had doubts about fundamental aspects of the work that went back to the earliest versions of the stories, and it seems that he felt the need to resolve these problems before he could produce the "final" version of "The Silmarillion".
_	However, the work that survives today is believed to be a truncated version, perhaps representing only around a third of the original size.
_	In each case, the work that was recognized was performed entirely at NIST, and virtually all of it was done under Gebbie's authority.
_	Today, substantial parts of the work that was produced at the center is housed at the University of Cape Town (Manuscripts and Archives) and at the University of the Western Cape (Mayibuye Centre and Centre for Humanities Research).
_	Finally, four and a half years later — a record time for the work that took the relay from 280 workers in two shifts — on July 14, 1909, President Nilo Peçanha inaugurated the Theatro Municipal do Rio de Janeiro, which had the capacity for 1,739 viewers.
_	While foundations supplied some support for the event, nearly all of the work that went into the process was done by volunteers.
_	Present-day formalists use proof theory to further our understanding in mathematics, but perhaps because of Gödel's work, they make no claims about semantic meaning in the work that they do with mathematics.
_	He worked over them, but the work that eventually appeared, the "Artis Analyticae Praxis" (1631), was edited together by Walter Warner.
_	Although they may be a subject of intrigue, the causes of its demise do not relate directly to the work that was carried out by the Group in terms of exhibitions, events and education.
_	However the award was specifically given for the work that the college had done to promote Mental Health Awareness in the Arts.
_	A group led by Lambis Englezos—who began the work that led to the recovery of over 200 men missing after the Battle of Fromelles, and reinterred at the new Fromelles (Pheasant Wood) Military Cemetery earlier in 2010—found eyewitness reports from Aliied prisoners of war who were ordered by the Germans to bury the men in shell holes after the Battle of Bullecourt.
_	Harley's co-creator, Paul Dini, describes their relationship as Harley being someone who makes the Joker feel better about himself, and who can do the work that he does not want to do himself.
_	Her evocative and sharply attentive photographs of the stages of life in American women earned her a Guggenheim Fellowship in 1999, enabling her to develop the work that resulted in her first major monograph, "Regarding Emma: Photographs of American Women and Girls" (Center for American Places, 2003).
_	This work added to a variety of reports from authors dating back to Fletcher, and to the work that initially determined critical ratios and critical bandwidths.
_	Then one day he announced that he had completed the work that he had returned from the dead to accomplish; returning to his normal personality and routine, he continued as dean of the Surmang shedra until his imprisonment by invading Chinese troops.
_	It has been alleged that the workers involved in the construction were not aware that they were building a nuclear bunker, and they were not allowed to disclose to anyone, not even their close families, the work that they were involved in.
_	There was this idea that there’s nothing in the work that couldn’t relate to why you made it.
_	Menger's (Principles of Economics) (1871), which was the work that had initially inspired the two men to study Political Economics.
_	James J. Gibson built off of the work that Bartlett originally laid down, suggesting that the degree of change found in a reproduction of an episodic memory depends on the manner in which that memory is later perceived.
_	As for his work in the uniting process, I would like to thank Abdul-Vakhed Niyazov for the work that he is doing for uniting Russian Muslims.
_	In spite of the enactment of the "law of expropriation in the public interest" in 1841, Rambuteau did not have the means or the ambition to implement the work that Haussmann later carried out, but he showed the way forward.
_	At the time, Hounsfield was not aware of the work that Cormack had done on the theoretical mathematics for such a device.
_	Radulovic sees design advocacy as being an important part of the work that he and his colleagues do.
_	Though this production never materialized, Vsevolozhsky continued showing interest in "Swan Lake", and even as "The Nutcracker" was being readied for production in 1892 he was designing costumes for a possible revival of the work that would be produced by Petipa (Vsevolozhsky was a talented costume designer, having designed the costumes for the first productions of both "The Sleeping Beauty" and "The Nutcracker", as well as "Raymonda", among many other ballets).
_	Anabel was so impressed by the work that journalists were doing that she realized there was nothing in the world she wanted to do more than be a journalist.
_	The papal anecdotes were found to be amusing but a strong antithesis to the church was noted throughout the work that condemned the waste of teaching the dimensions of Solomon's temple while the "laws of nature and scientific truths" were neglected.
_	This is criticism against the work that has been done over many years".
_	The controller should delegate the work that needs to be done to other objects; it coordinates or controls the activity.
_	Note: Kelvin defined the surface tension formula_6 as the work that was performed per unit area "by" the interface rather than "on" the interface; hence his term containing formula_6 has a minus sign.
_	As a result, Scruton says that, especially where pitches are concerned, "Le Marteau" "contains no recognizable material – no units of significance that can live outside the work that produces them" .
_	Clara was an active member of the Nazi Party and used tissue taken from executed victims of the Third Reich for his research—including the work that led to his discovery of Clara cells.
_	Baptism is not a human work; it is the place where God does the work that only God can do."
_	Although he discovered the cause of hand, foot and mouth disease, the work that gained him an international reputation began in the early 1970s with the discovery of viruses causing diarrhoea, particularly in infants and young children.
_	Some of the work that the Parada San Juan Bautista, Inc has done include a month long event for the parade with a community commemorative mass and a coronation pageant.
_	Along with the work that allows the participating companies to transfer to the new Exhibition Hall, there was the shrink in the crowd from the CeBIT Asia previously.
_	She said of receiving the award, "I greatly appreciate the work that GLAAD continues to do, promoting equality, fair representation and tolerance for our LGBT community.
_	Researchers shape the work that they do and work as the instrument for collecting and analyzing data.
_	But others were deceived into the work that they would be doing.
_	There was only one chapter in the work that referred to her own research relating to Einstein and Schrödinger, but the book contained a few references to the doctoral theses that she had advised.
_	At the end of August, students can catch up on the work that has yet to be completed and resit for exams.
_	He began the work that was completed by his son Charles E. Saunders to develop the important wheat cultivar 'Marquis'.
_	"The Sea" was the work that first introduced the ten-year-old Benjamin Britten to Bridge's music.
_	In October 2011, Nordic Games expressed their desire to continue the work that JoWooD Entertainment was doing on different projects, including the release of Faith in Destiny.
_	Neurath said that Electronic Arts was dissatisfied with the work that another studio had been doing on "John Madden Football '93", and that the publisher was "scrambling to find a [replacement] team" to meet the game's rapidly approaching deadline.
_	On June 21, 2012 Bryson resigned because, "the work that [Commerce employees] do to help America’s entrepreneurs and businesses build our economy and create jobs is more important now than ever and I have come to the conclusion that I need to step down to prevent distractions from this critical mission."
_	It was the work that was the thing... the craft."
_	“If leaders are to be credited with setting the vision for the department or organization and inspiring followers to action, then followers need to be credited with the work that is required to make the vision a reality.
_	Karel van Mander looked for an applicable meaning to the work that constructed a moral concept to the classical literature.
_	Leonard Balsera took on the role of Lead System Developer for "Dresden Files" while Underkoffler became the Lead Setting Developer, taking over the work that Genevieve Cogman had previously done.
_	They were shown around the area and were given the chance to see the work that had been produced in the space where it had been made, they were also able to talk to the artists about the process of production.
_	In a radio talk in 1964 the Nobel laureate Peter Medawar even criticised this instructive text structure for not giving a realistic representation of the thought processes of the writing scientist: "… the scientific paper may be a fraud because it misrepresents the processes of thought that accompanied or gave rise to the work that is described in the paper".
_	He advised Governments, and was instrumental in the work that lead to the National Insurance Act 1911.
_	My big challenge is to show this in the work that I do."
_	The "Promessi Sposi" (The Betrothed) is the work that has made him immortal.
_	It is also possible that the work that had begun as early as 1178 was renewed sometime around 1190–94.
_	The famed artist and film director Chen Yifei was so impressed by the work that he invited Yim to dine with him at his home in Shanghai in 1979.
_	In "The New Statesman", India Bourke wrote of the work that, "Drawing equally from science and art, each chapter (one for every week of the year) offers salves for both body and mind, from probiotics to poetry."
_	The song reflects the work that thousands of Irish section crews did as track layers, gaugers, spikers, and bolters.
_	The new building’s sculptural quality is fitting to the work that goes on inside.
_	He decides to start his kids' (Ragnhild and Brage) summer vacation with them up in that area - doing on a smaller scale the work that they had been pursuing, with Allen and a small crew from the region.
_	They would occasionally meet to discuss the work that had been completed; while this method was not in itself unusual, Gilmour began to feel strained, sometimes barely maintaining his composure.
_	Although the paired-associates technique is highly recognized as one of Calkins' biggest contributions to psychology, this is not the work that Calkins herself attached very much importance to.
_	It is used in reference to business process outsourcing or BPO, which is the outsourcing of the work that does not require much of technical skills.
_	When writer Frances Denton of Photoplay visited Universal Studios in 1918, she described the work that Wilson was creating as “sob stuff” and was noticed as one of the female directors at Universal that created films centering around children.
_	Nonetheless, the Club was known as an exemplary center for guidance among Azerbaijani women for the work that it carried out.
_	Robert Schumann wrote of the work that "it would be difficult to find anything merrier than this whim...
_	The work that leaves the system is equal to the work that enters the system plus the difference between the heat added to the system and the heat that leaves the system; in other words, net gain of work is equal to the difference between the heat added to the system and the heat that leaves the system.
_	There are discernible patterns in the work that indicate that every movement is in a different tonality.
_	Enrico Fermi, came from Italy in 1938 and led the work that produced the world's first self-sustaining nuclear chain reaction.
_	The inmates were protesting generally poor conditions, and were also demanding that they be paid for the work that they did.
_	On May 28, 2009, GenderPAC closed its doors and shut down its website, citing the number of other organizations now doing the work that it was originally created for.
_	""The Hannes Alfvén Medal goes to Eckart Marsch for his fundamental contributions to our understanding of the kinetic processes and plasma turbulence in the heliosphere, as well as to the work that has made Helios a successful mission and initiated the Solar Orbiter"."
_	HOSH is largely recognized for the work that they do on hip and knee replacements.
_	However, shortly after HENSE and several artists countersued stating they had nothing to do with the work that they were being sued for.
_	We appreciate the work that our University counsel has provided during this process and can now maintain focus on moving forward as a University community."
_	Cuso International continues to be proud of its volunteers and the work that they do, 'with' more than 'for' the people of southern countries and partner organizations.
_	When a new problem can be shown to follow the laws of one of these algebraic structures, all the work that has been done on that category in the past can be applied to the new problem.
_	The Premier Morris Iemma was asked about the Western FastRail proposal, and said that "the proposal on Penrith has got to stack up," and "the work that has been done shows that it does not stack up, for a number of reasons."
_	The biggest and most prestigious of them all being the work that was completed in 1994 costing some £220,000.
_	Because this position is traditionally filled by the wife of the President, there is no clarity for the case of the spouse of a female president, regarding to the work that traditionally are performed by the first lady.
_	There was a great sense of tension and energy in the work that was palpable to audiences.
_	Instead, they rely on the developer of the work that has been cloned to initiate a complaint regarding the clone, which may take time for review.
_	These women may feel empowered by the work that they do, in the sense that they can better provide for their families, and be seen for something other than what society treats women.
_	Lastly, there are celebrity ambassadors who help raise awareness of the work that is done by The Prince's Trust in young people's lives.
_	It is however the work that Sveshnikov did with his close friend Grandmaster Gennady Timoshchenko during the 1960s and 1970s that bears greatest testimony to his chess achievements.
_	Three days before the Jamboree was due to open, a vicious storm of hurricane strength (the tail end of Hurricane Connie) blew over the camp for nearly 24 hours, flattening much of the work that the volunteers and professionals spent six weeks preparing.
_	The unusual delay in the Nobel award, which came more than four decades after the work that it recognized, may have resulted from negative views of the work's relationship to nuclear power.
_	Going into 1872, the railroad had five turnouts (switches), 3 miles of iron rail and 27,000 cross ties on hand for the work that year, but overall, progress on the road had been slowed for .."want of labor".
_	“As you know, literacy has been my life-long passion, and I am so proud of the work that my foundation has done to advance the cause and encourage people of all ages to experience the joy of reading,” said Mrs. Bush.
_	In 2018, Radius Books will publish a monograph of the work that Lynch co-designed.
_	Ultimately the work that emerged was a massive typescript unfinished upon Phipps' death in June 1923.
_	In their review, "The New York Times" called the film "a sorry reincarnation" of the original, and said: "This film wastes the talents of actors like Geoffrey Rush and Peter Gallagher in hollow roles and relies heavily on its sets and special effects to do the work that should have been accomplished by its director and writer."
_	The "Histoire Naturelle, générale et particulière, avec la description du Cabinet du Roi" is the work that the Comte de Buffon (1707–1788) is remembered for.
_	Harris returns to earth and contemplates all the work that lies ahead of him.
_	To manage the work that will lead to the achievement of this goal, CCD established the following Committees to guide their activities in key areas:
_	Sediment continued to build up in the main river bed, making it possible that the river would continue to rise and would render the work that had been done pointless, with waterlogging returning.
_	To be eligible for the "Best Student Paper" award, a paper must have been primarily authored by a student and the work that the paper reports must have been undertaken by the student authors.
_	The Last Planner System is used principally in construction and particularly focuses on pull and flow but perhaps more important than those is its emphasis on a collaborative approach in which all trades work together to create a visual representation of the work that needs to be done.
_	They hire scientists from other countries to submit the work that they did abroad under completely different conditions for the Research Assessment that is supposed to gauge the performance of British universities.
_	Examples are the use of mercenaries to perform the work that the Culture does not want to get their hands dirty with, and even outright threats of invasion (the Culture has issued ultimatums to other civilizations before).
_	Her book, "Home Front: Nigerian Army Officers and Their Wives", published in 1988, emphasized the value of the work that women perform in the home in support of their husbands, and has been criticized by feminists.
_	William Zisman had several key findings in the work that he did:
_	Tomino commented apart from the actual announcement of the work that the theme of the film would involve family matters.
_	Playford later dubbed the East End Markets his 'university', due to the work that he carried out there.
_	Steve Gooding had previously been Director General of Roads, Traffic and Local Group at the Department for Transport and led the work that resulted in the transformation of the Highways Agency into Highways England.
_	In an interview in 2007, Healey cited her greatest accomplishment as lieutenant governor as the work that she did to ensure the passage of Melanie's Law, a 2005 law that strengthened penalties for drunk driving in order to keep repeat offenders off the road.
_	He respects Incabulos, who starts the work that Nerull completes, but has nothing to do with him; their priests do not cooperate unless faced with a common enemy.
_	Also, stereotypes about gay activists within the gay community, the role of activists for the community, and the work that activist do and should do were discussed.
_	Most of the work that used to take place in Dell's U.S. plants was transferred to contract manufacturers in Asia and Mexico, or some of Dell's own factories overseas.
_	Since the total force opposing the vehicle's motion (at constant speed) multiplied by the distance through which the vehicle travels represents the work that the vehicle's engine must perform, the study of fuel economy (the amount of energy consumed per unit of distance traveled) requires a detailed analysis of the forces that oppose a vehicle's motion.
_	Some say the Nazis remained indifferent to the work that was composed and sung inside the ghetto.
_	After Milton was accused of being a worse person than Cromwell, he wrote in the work that it was "the highest praise you could bestow on me".
_	These deaths are almost always the result of the work that was being done and not because the tree or a part of the tree failed on its own accord.
_	The basic function of the work that is placed out in a public space is to change a detail in our everyday life
_	The Nazis put him in the Łódź Ghetto in 1939, where he found work as a photographer, making identification cards and documenting the work that his fellow inmates did in the ghetto.
_	Kahne had put the band in the studio for unexpectedly long hours, and the work that received the biggest investment of time was the new song "China".
_	He was responsible for hiring Clyde Tombaugh and supervised the work that led to the discovery of Pluto in 1930.
_	Among the work that passed through William Bennett’s office in the late 1930s were: the Dalkeith and Nedlands tennis clubs; Lord Forrest Olympic Pool, Kalgoorlie, Western Australia; infant health centres at Dalkeith, Manjimup and Nedlands; the Scarborough, Ocean Beach, Majestic and Raffles hotels in Perth, Checkers Hotel Bullsbrook, Sawyers Valley Tavern and a hotel in Beverley; Plaza Theatre and Arcade in the Hay Street Mall, and the Regal Theatre in Subiaco with William Leighton; Applecross town hall, the Masonic Temple, Nedlands; the Young Australia League headquarters building in Murray Street, a number of private houses in suburbs such as Dalkeith, Cottesloe and South Perth; and over a dozen buildings and structures at Araluen.
_	According to Young, the work that he and Martin did would not have been possible if it weren’t for the support of the women they married.
_	Although it's tough to top the work that MacGowan did with the Pogues, "The Crock of Gold" is a worthy effort that fans of MacGowan and the Pogues are sure to enjoy."
_	Marks created a website to describe the work that he and Dembski were doing, which the website described as happening at the "Evolutionary Informatics Lab" at Baylor.
_	Based on "Patterns" and the work that followed, Boyd has been called "America's greatest military theorist".
_	Hal started out as music arrangers in 1999, and became known especially for the work that they did (and are still doing) with Ayumi Hamasaki.
_	It is easier to see the effeminate beauty of the shepherd as corresponding to Del Monte’s personal aesthetic taste, than as the work that Ciriaco Mattei commissioned shortly afterwards for his first-born son, named indeed Giovanni Battista, a painting that is to be sought in one of the many paintings of St John the Baptist that Caravaggio executed.
_	Alexander elaborated on the job requirements in a letter to Grinnell dated September, 1907 after she returned from Alaska: "I should like to see a collection developed (more especially of the California fauna) and would be glad to give what support I could if I could find the right man to take hold; someone interested not only in bringing a collection together but with the larger object in view, namely gathering data in connection with the work that would have direct bearing on the important biological issues of the day.
_	Work systematically and intelligently carried on is the work that counts."
_	There, he began the work that culminated in the Nobel prize.
_	NGOs closely monitor the organization's declarations and actions, ensuring that the work that is being executed on behalf of the ICC is fulfilling its objectives and responsibilities to civil society.
_	Mears was paid US$1,500 for the work that she had already done, but the loss of the commission was a shock from which she never recovered.
_	Philip overruled him, and began the work that led to the Spanish Armada.
_	During his tenure at AT&T, he supported the work that led to AT&T receiving two Baldridge Awards.
_	It is the only movement of the work that was completed.
_	Although regularly referred to as the "Stockline Plastics factory", largely due to the signage around the building, the factory was owned by ICL Plastics and indeed a large majority of the work that took place there was for ICL Technical Plastics.
_	On the contrary it is evident in every line of the work that Aristotle is presupposing 'normal' auditors, normal states of mind and feeling, normal emotional and aesthetic experience."
_	Throughout the Byzantine period the manuscript was used as the original for copies of the work that were given to foreign leaders, including the Arabic edition of Abd al-Rahman III of Spain for the creation of which the Byzantine Emperor Constantine VII sent a Greek copy and a translator.
_	He is forcing the girl to live up to the idealism of her nature, forcing her to carry on with the work that in these days is far more important than the love of two little people."
_	Little is known about the work that followed, but in the 1825 boatmen on the Lahn who shipped mineral water from springs in Selters and Fachingen addressed a letter of appreciation to the Nassau government in Wiesbaden for the rehabilitation of river systems.
_	The event served as a retrospective of the work that Kong, who turned eighty in March 2012, produced during the prior sixty years of his life.
_	It was important the work that during the 16th century, several of them did in defense of the Natives, against the exploitation of which they were object by the encomenderos.
_	That year it was also re-released theatrically, and film critic Andrew Sarris described it as "the great American film" and "the work that influenced the cinema more profoundly than any American film since "Birth of a Nation"."
_	Their central location in settlements and the work that evidently went into constructing them is indicative of their importance to the community.
_	These buildings along with the buildings built in the 1960s under Yuncken Freeman Architects portray the work that the government has done over the past 150 years while operating in the Precinct.
_	In the meantime, radio contact with 15th Air Force was reestablished and a request made for urgently needed supplies and a message sent with regard to the work that was being done on the first field.
_	One for Comic Relief to highlight the work that British Airways had done to raise money.
_	It is not known to survive as a stand-alone work, but its readings were copied into several printed copies of the "Kojiki", and an edition of the work that was independently annoted by Norinaga also survives.
_	Yet it is not the work that has changed but its relation within the accepted narrative of music history.
_	The preserving of the integrity of the work allows the author to object to alteration, distortion, or mutilation of the work that is "prejudicial to the author's honor or reputation".
_	During this period nearly all of The Scumfrog's artist releases were on Effin Records, his own label with manager/partner Steve Rosen, and although the label never attained massive commercial success it proved to a valuable laboratory for the work that was to come.
_	He reports in the work that he spent time not only in his native Samarqand, but also in Herat, Tus (where he visited Ferdowsi's tomb and gathered material on the great poet), Balkh, and Nishapur, where he lived for perhaps five years.
_	Consequently, Māgha is more admired as a poet than the work is as a whole, and the sections of the work that may be considered digressions from the story have the nature of an anthology and are more popular.
_	In the fifth edition of the book in 1710, Swift provided an apparatus to the work that incorporated Wotton's explanations and Swift's narrator's notes.
_	The Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences (AMPAS) awarded a special Oscar for the work that the NFB did during World War II.
_	"As a professional researcher you take pride in the work that you do.
_	Rovers fans recognised the work that Colbon gets through in defence and the metres gained in attack.
_	During his stay in the hospital, he learned of the work that the Harlem Ashram was doing with the local Puerto Ricans.
_	By the late 1970s, as the original Pilates studio was “withering away in New York,” Fletcher’s high-profile name, and his celebrated Hollywood clientele, led to a renaissance of the work that is largely credited with keeping the Pilates name alive and in front of the public.
_	Soon he was filling up his journals with the work that led to the book which "Time" magazine later described as having "...redefined the image of monasticism and made the concept of saintliness accessible to moderns."
_	In 2007, White claimed that he is proud of the work that he did in the band.
_	In 1953 he published the work that now stands as his greatest masterpiece, "Chapel Road" ("De Kapellekensbaan", translated by Adrienne Dixon), which he began to write as early as 1943.
_	After the airlift was completed, there was a commemoration service for the work that had been accomplished in this country.
_	Much of the work that has gone into improving speakers in recent years has been about reducing colouration, and Fast Fourier Transform, or FFT, measuring equipment was introduced in order to measure the delayed output from speakers and display it as a time vs. frequency waterfall plot or spectrogram plot.
_	"The Watchtower" told Witnesses: "It is proper to cover over our arrangements for the work that God commands us to do.
_	All the work that was implemented during Queen Josefina's lifetime led to a development that made Rosendals Trädgård flourish.
_	Shortly after the European tour ended, Horrorpops returned to the states to play Jimmy Kimmel Live and a few California shows, but realizing the work that lay ahead and how time-consuming the band had become, Mille had to leave the band to go back to school.
_	Heisenberg won the [[Nobel Prize in Physics]] in 1932 for the work that he did at around this time.]]
_	In a typical example of the work that Schmidlin was called upon to perform, the "Sydney Morning Herald" carried this story on 15 August 1896.
_	It also began serializing "" in August 1991, which became the work that the three artists Mokona, Nekoi, and Igarashi enjoyed working on most.
_	It had an unfamiliar tone and many of Gossaín's readers were hooked to the work that he had created.
_	Colcock continued the work that Captain Graham started in 1843-1844.
_	While the Foundation no longer uses the term RAMPS, in some cases it continues to support the work that came out of these enterprises through partner organizations in India, Indonesia, and Peru (including Villgro).
_	Contrary to repeated misconception, this remix does not contain any of the work that the three surviving members of the Beatles recorded in the 1990s.
_	After all the work that went into it, we would have wanted our design in proper form.
_	Small is the work that you have done.
_	Attention then shifted to the castle and on finishing the work that had halted in 1292.
_	All are bleak, and remain so, but the work that goes on in these buildings is various and dedicated:
_	Research that will be based on field work will need to be explained carefully for the reviewers to have a clear picture the work that will be completed.
_	The process culminated in four world premieres presented to an audience of more than 1,000, and raised £182,000 towards the work that the theatre does with emerging talent, schools and the community.
_	Clausius showed, however, that we must take into account the work that the molecules of the working body, i.e., the water molecules in the cylinder, do on each other as they pass or transform from one step of or state of the engine cycle to the next, e.g., from ("P","V") to ("P","V").
_	On 17 April 1756, he wrote with undisguised contempt for publishers' disinterest in the work that "the complete manuscript will be at the Dresden court, kept under lock and key as something very rare."
_	Some of the work that RAA has created or produced in the last year includes:
_	If it is agreed upon, for example in a signed contract, the ghostwriter will sign over all the rights to everything he or she adds into the work that is not otherwise copyrighted to someone else.
_	Chief of Staff of the United States Army, General Douglas MacArthur, commended the officers of the Aviation unit of the California National Guard, for the efficient manner in which they performed the work that was assigned to them during the National Air exercises at Dayton.
_	Catherine the Great, czar of Russia, was so impressed by the work that she sent Buchan a gold medal and personal letter.
_	A second series of oral histories, funded by the National Endowment for the Humanities, will focus on the work that led to the Voting Rights Act of 1965.
_	Classical works such as the Purananuru, Manimekalai, Silappathikaram, and Kamba Ramayanam all cite the Kural by various names, bestowing numerous titles to the work that was originally untitled by its author.
_	These ships, before reaching their destination, were the target of fires perpetrated by the besieged who never failed to compromise the work that was particularly hostile to them.
_	These performances are in the form of dance groups that travel around the island to get on stage and show the work that they put in for the people to enjoy.
_	One will choose the reward scope in harmony with the work that has been achieved.
_	The adventurers were given for the work that had already been carried out, and further work was again to be overseen by Vermuyden, but little work was done, as the English Civil War intervened.
_	He commented that this was the case because Britain's archaeological community had failed to develop the work that he had done with "Time Team" and with extramural teaching, and that all the public outreach he had accomplished would die with him.
_	When announcing his candidacy for the Liberal nomination he said; "I support the work that the Liberal governments are doing.
_	According to the Washington Post, Eric Betzig believes that this development will have a greater impact than the work that earned him the 2014 Nobel Prize in Chemistry for "the development of super-resolved fluorescence microscopy".
_	Upon reversal, the work that is done "by" a system is the negative of the change in its internal energy corresponding to the positive "dV" of an increasing volume.
_	Despite the work that Muslim Americans have done to normalize their faith practices in America and establish themselves within the society, discrimination and islamophobia continue to serve as obstacle to true integration.
_	Years before, Joseph Chamberlain had proclaimed that, if Britain were to step away from its "manifest destiny", it would by default leave it to other nations to take up the work that it would have been seen as "too weak, too poor, and too cowardly" to have done itself.
_	During his tenure at this University, he completed the work that led to sharing the Nobel prize.
_	Understanding this cultural revolution of computing takes one far in understanding why Hoyle (1954) was forgotten and B2FH appeared to have been the work that founded stellar nucleosynthesis, as many even claimed.
_	I think that has been very crucial to a lot of the work that I have been doing recently"."
_	Williams remarked about the story in a "New York Times" interview, that " I was sixteen when I wrote ["The Vengeance of Nitocris"], but already a confirmed writer, having entered upon this vocation at the age of fourteen, and, if you're well acquainted with my writings since then, I don't have to tell you that it set the keynote for most of the work that has followed."
_	As a mark of thanks for the work that Mr John Power had done for the York Road community in Waterloo, Sierra Leone, he was crowned Chief Kombrbai II.
_	While Pruitt was being grilled, largely along party lines, during an April 2018 hearing about the ethics concerns, Johnson said, "I think it's shameful today that this hearing has turned into a personal attack hearing and a shameful attempt to denigrate the work that's being done at the EPA and with this administration".
_	According to the Child Labour Programme of Action, this work should not be seen as child labour, a term which implies that someone benefits unduly from the work that children do.
_	There are several major scenes within the work that follow the pattern of emotional progression.
_	From the beginning, the museum officials prevailed above all the quality of the work that they loved playing, rather than quantity.
_	Since the founding of the education programme in 1989 the work that Spitalfields Music does with the community of Tower Hamlets and grown considerably.
_	Shortly after, a controversy arose over the authorship of the work that continues today.
_	You can be really, really proud of the work that you do."
_	The universalist approach to motherhood is aimed at conceptualizing the work that mothers do.
_	There was no branch of the work that William was not interested in.
_	Bradley states, "I feel that music is something that a lot of young people are into and it's a good method to communicate the work that we're doing ...
_	Further references about the exhibitions that Linardié has mounted can be found by using Google under the heading, « Château de Linardié », where there are currently over 700 pages listed, quoting or presenting the work that has been accomplished at Linardié over a period of ten years.
_	Great reforms develop slowly, but truth will prevail, and the work that we have been doing for thirty years has paid as well as any work that has ever been done for humanity."
_	But this is the work that inspires me, empowering young people to become active in their communities".
_	Byrd argued that the work that Bouligny, Inc. was performing (building electric substations) was not part of Blue Ridge's "trade or business."
_	They consolidated the work that Blaze had begun and, during their administration, the school continued to develop.
_	National Forums are forums within specific countries of the world where the Bible agencies there have meetings to determine the work that each organization will do within that country.
_	That goal was ambitious, because most of the work that had been done to that point was on floodplains and flat terrain.
_	The United States Congress acknowledged the work that he had performed when preparing his plan for the city of Washington by voting to pay him for his efforts.
_	The following is a synopsis for the typical two-act presentation of the work that is most often used for modern performances.
_	The latter suit was eventually dismissed by a district court after Perry made substantial changes to the work that satisfied the Estate's original objection to its publication, and the parties reached an out-of-court settlement.
_	The series is distinguished by the inclusion of primary source documents contemporaneous with the work that help demonstrate the context out of which the work emerged.
_	Róheim eventually abandoned the assumptions of "Totem and Taboo", but continued to regard it as a classic, the work that created psychoanalytic anthropology.
_	Site preparation is the work that is done before a forest area is regenerated.
_	That's why a lot of the work that I do is about belonging and home, because it has always been this thing that was out there."
_	Most of these ideas first emerged in the work that gave Gordon a reputation in Fanon studies—namely, "Fanon and the Crisis of European Man: An Essay on Philosophy and the Human Sciences" (1995).
_	In 1921 the Hamburg firm of Stolzenberg took over the work that had been previously carried out by König and Evaporator AG.
_	In 1987 Andy joined Harlequin Limited, founding the RIP division and bringing with him the work that he'd done at Bath University.
_	The "first edition" of a trade book may be the first iteration of the work printed by the publisher in question or the first iteration of the work that includes a specific set of illustrations or editorial commentary.
_	It was written in Medieval Latin, at the request of Pope Clement IV, to explain the work that Bacon had undertaken.
_	Baptism is not a human work; it is the place where God does the work that only God can do."
_	The historian Dorothy Whitelock says of the work that it is "unique among post-Conquest monastic histories".
_	Judicial independence is also secured through a prohibition on permanent judges (no matter what office) from undertaking paid employment, and on restrictions as to the work that part-time or temporary judges can undertake.
_	Monod describes as "the frontier" the work that is to be done that will enable us to understand how this instrument of intuitive preconception works.
_	His death was premature and to some extent caused by the heavy burden of all the work that Smuts had entrusted to him.
_	He arrived in England in 1612 to carry on the work that his brother Salomon de Caus had left behind.
_	Lawrence, though, had become so tired of the work that he allowed Edward Garnett to cut about a hundred pages from the text.
_	Levine praised the work that Naughty Dog had done, and felt he would be able to create the same with a more somber period piece.
_	In the field of New Testament research, his work (and also the work that he did together with his wife Barbara Aland in the Institute for New Testament Textual Research in Münster) is internationally acclaimed.
_	On 27 October, D. Manuel ordered payment of mason Martim Lourenço for his work in Almeida, to ""look at the work that was completed by Francisco de Anzinho"".
_	The philosopher A. C. Grayling writes of the work that, "Parts of this famous book are sketchy ... in other respects it is a marvelously readable, magnificently sweeping survey of Western thought, distinctive for placing it informatively into its historical context.
_	This was precisely the work that brought him into contact with Luis Buñuel, who acted as producer and in some cases, as in "Centinela alerta", as director.
_	Many people tend to focus on the historic cowboy lifestyle, but the work that cowboys do continues.
_	Gender-Responsive evaluation is important as a means for building strong systems for generating and using evidence in order to improve the work that people do to achieve gender equality and women’s empowerment.
_	The terms and conditions of the GPL must be made available to anybody receiving a copy of the work that has a GPL applied to it ("the licensee").
_	He performed pioneering work in the field of surveying and map-making and was involved in the work that led to the first modern plan-form map, though his plan for London on a grid system was rejected in favour of rebuilding along the existing routes.
_	On the last day of August Mackintosh recorded in his diary the work that had been completed during the winter, and ended: "Tomorrow we start for Hut Point".
_	He wanted potential colonists to be aware of the dangers that they faced, the work that colonization would require, and the benefits that they stood to gain.
_	Sir John Eardley-Wilmot, 1st Baronet, during his period was Lt. Governor of Tasmania, did much of the work that led to the modern museum.
_	"If the work that the Clubs do, if their influence on personal character and their contribution to the sum total of human happiness be correctly appreciated...then shall the investigator reckon Henry Solly amongst the constructive statesmen of our time".
_	These seminal papers served as the foundation for all of the work that has been done subsequently.
_	Thomas Hutchinson was pleased with the work that Peter Oliver did, and made him chief justice of the Superior Court in 1772.
_	Land himself cites "The Dig" score as the work that comes closest to his own personal style.
_	The expense for this process is much lower and would enable one of the leaders within the country to do the teaching and leading of the conference to a better understanding of the work that is to be done.
_	Then in 1913 Wellesley embarked on what was to be his last voyage to visit the work that The Mission to Lepers had started.
_	McWhorter considers it the work that first made him known to larger audiences and contributed to the perception of him being a conservative commentator.
_	Through several performance, in Geoffrey Unsworth's luscious cinematography (and I mean the adjective in praise of the uncluttered and naturally generated flow his work deserves), and in the pacing there is somehow a sensuality and a sexuality underlying the work that I had not hitherto felt."
_	It was the work that made him famous and remains to this day one of his most widely read.
_	In the catalog, Gershuni gave an explanation of the work that dealt both with internal politics and his own personal feelings:
_	In some versions of the tale, the sentry was so touched by the work that he became a disciple and left with Laozi, never to be seen again.
_	The presence of the new linux-next git repository has offloaded much of the work that made mm maintenance so difficult, allowing Andrew Morton to continue to use Quilt to manage his series of "mmotm" (mm of the moment) patches.
_	From references to the work that survived, it is known that its central character is an exceedingly stupid man named "Margites" (from ancient Greek , "margos", "raving, mad; lustful") who was so dense he did not know which parent had given birth to him.
_	The work at which I was employed in my boyhood, while it was limited to ten hours a day, was similar to the work that children have to do in the woollen mills of Yorkshire at the present time, with this difference, that wool is the manufacture in the Yorkshire mills to which I allude, and the manufacture that I was employed in was cotton, the mode of manufacturing which has been altogether changed since that period by the improvements made in machinery.
_	This word originally meant help, such as one neighbour might give another, but it came to mean the work that a tenant on a European-owned estate had to undertake in lieu of rent.
_	Warshaw, known for developing a unique language and philosophy of drawing, infused the scientific knowledge of the day in the work that must also have appealed to the young Brown who later became a vociferous disciple of Buckminster Fuller.
_	As Elizabeth was the illustrator of all the works, not her husband, Gould then needed to recruit other artists to finish the work that Elizabeth had tirelessly begun.
_	The Master Craftsman was responsible for the quality of the work that left his "atelier" or workshop, regardless of who made the item.
_	His son Chaim wrote in the preface to the work that his father was frequently sick and suffered pain and discomfort.
_	He also promised to build on the work that his predecessors, namely Steve Tshwete and Fikile Mbalula, had started.
_	Realizing the extent of the work that would be needed for such a game, the developers decided to instead make something "nontraditional and nonviolent".
_	Du Pont was impressed with the work that Kettering had done.
_	As Siva Vaidhyanathan stated in the opening of his review, “"there is no better place to turn for an account of the processes of creativity and commerce relating to digital networks and the work that people do with them."”
_	It also allows NCVYS to act as the voice of the voluntary and community youth sector, giving members the opportunity to influence government policy and giving them a platform to raise the profile of the work that they do.
_	He concluded "You can really appreciate all the work that went into making sure that all of the little things came together so nicely."
_	On August 26, 1953 a memorandum was written for the commendation for the work that John Waller had done for TPAJAX.
_	Given that the outputs of much of the work that is undertaken in advance of development work is not published in peer reviewed journals, the people that perform the actual research are often anonymous and unrecognized.
_	These were closely related to the work that they and others were doing for outlets like "Weird Tales", such as Moore's Northwest Smith stories.
_	In 1973, Brus joined AT&T Bell Laboratories, where he did the work that led to the discovery of quantum dots.
_	Thackeray achieved more recognition with his "Snob Papers" (serialised 1846/7, published in book form in 1848), but the work that really established his fame was the novel "Vanity Fair", which first appeared in serialised instalments beginning in January 1847.
_	It’s because of Lisa’s overall expertise, likeability, and willingness to roll up her sleeves and do the work that she has become one of America’s most popular designers.
_	Eliot regarded "Four Quartets" as his masterpiece, and it is the work that led to his being awarded the Nobel Prize in Literature.
_	Sometimes teachers were not supportive of the work that peer educators were doing.
_	He is remembered for the work that he has done for the introduction, acceptance and popularization of the women's wrestling in India.
_	Due to the show's depiction of social workers, and the work that they do in Spain, the Association of Directors and Managers of Social Services (Asociación de Directores y Gerentes de Servicios Sociales) awarded its annual prize to the series in 2000.
_	In the late seventies Juan Montalvo was twice exiled to France, remaining there from 1879, as punishment for "Las catilinarias" (1880), the work that made him famous throughout intellectual circles in the United States, Europe and the rest of Latin America.
_	Joe for the work that he completed on her flat and they part company.
_	Same information indicated that "activities under the AMAD Plan were brought to a halt in late 2003 and that the work was fully recorded, equipment and work places were either cleaned or disposed of so that there would be little to identify the sensitive nature of the work that had been undertaken."
_	In the work that she creates, writes and directs, such as XXY and The German Doctor, she focuses on the question of medically modified bodies.
_	SuperMegaMonkey of "Comics Chronology" stated that the implied storyline with the character of Shiv felt cheap and that DeFalco went overboard with Wolverine in the end, ignoring the work that Claremont had done with Wolverine's character to help him contain his murderous side.
_	The series' title sequence, designed by Elastic, evokes the work that the company did for the series "True Detective" by recreating the characters of the show out of elements of its setting: the sequence depicts the four Defenders out of colored topographical maps of New York City, showing the different areas of the city that each of them come from.
_	Awards is an accolade recognizing the people and the work that did not receive Academy Award nominations.
_	Her recent major album is titled "Up.Rooted", and all the work that she has compiled together has earned her various awards, such as Best Latin Band.
_	These first early paintings, much like the work that preceded them, were performative renderings and records of the exact thoughts the artist had at the point of their creation; an immediate narrative produced in real time.
_	She created a mini documentary showcasing the work that Kenyan lawyers are doing to take the Kenyan Government to task for not protecting young girls from rape.
_	The organisation has become well known internationally though and many prominent public figures actively encourage and support the work that they do, among them the former Archbishop of Canterbury, Dr. Rowan Williams, who describes the organisation's aims as:
_	Her grandmother often received angry letters about the work that she did.
_	From the earliest ages right up through adolescence he was exempt from the work that was required of his older brothers who helped clear land, cut forest, plant an apple orchard and help build the family home and their father's school: the Vermont Episcopal Institute at Rock Point (Burlington, Vermont).
_	Quoting from Lost Horizon, the work that introduced the concept of Shangri-La, he said that Tibet would only become "an everlasting peaceful land" if separatist agitation were quashed and all ethnic groups in Tibet developed equally.
_	His master’s graduation feature film Desire Street (co-directed with Roberto F. Canuto) was the work that bring more attention, awards and international recognition until 2013, when produced under "Almost Red Production" in China, also co-directed with Roberto F. Canuto, the trilogy "El Chengdu Invisible", including (2013), Floating Melon (2015) and Sunken Plum (2017).
_	House Speaker Shap Smith said that votes changed in the House not because of specific pressures but because "it was to some degree just a vote to recognize the work that the Legislature had done".
_	Mäenpää had already worked with Wåhlin on the artwork for the Ensiferum albums, but Mäenpää was inspired by the work that delved into colder, majestic landscapes, including Emperor's "In the Nightside Eclipse" and Dissection's "Storm of the Light's Bane".
_	The result is more understandable plot development, and the revelation of themes of the work that tend to be obscured in shorter versions, such as class striving and the values of character vs. wealth.
_	When we see on Twitter that some of our fans are going through it now we find it so upsetting and that's the reason we feel so passionate about this campaign and the work that BeatBullying does."
_	This is a valuable document on the work that he accomplished in the Department II, his management of "Prensa y Propaganda" that depended directly on the Commander in Chief of Army Operations.
_	However, some of the work that was planned, such as the stenciling on the beams and walls, and installing the ornamental light fixtures, was not completed at that time.
_	Together Moss and Burney continued the work that had been started by Bertha Porter (with Moss as her assistant) in the early 1920s on the "Topographical Bibliography of Ancient Egyptian Hieroglyphic Texts, Reliefs, and Paintings".
_	Thus, I would urge you not to put on paper "anything" relating to any of the work that you are doing... [unless] you know the recipient well enough to put at the top of the page 'PLEASE DESTROY AFTER READING.
_	In 2014 the Executive Director of National Agency for the Prohibition of Traffic in Persons (NAPTIP), Beatrice Jedy-Agba was given in an award by John Kerry in Washington DC to recognise the work that she has been leading against trafficking in Nigeria..
_	Some of the work that had been completed in 2008 included the reopening of the Labore Road bridge and its approaches, Interstate 694 WB leaving the west end of the commons section, EB Interstate 694 at U.S. Highway 61, as well as landscaping and noisewall painting.
_	He was particularly enamored with the work that Jack Kirby and Steve Ditko produced for Marvel Comics, as well as Hank Ketcham's "Dennis the Menace" and the Archie comics line.
_	Understanding this computer cultural revolution takes one far in understanding why Hoyle (1954) was forgotten and B2FH appeared to have been the work that founded stellar nucleosynthesis, as many even claimed.
_	An integral part of Midland's philosophy is self-reliance, and students and faculty perform much of the work that goes into maintaining the school.
_	Repin considered "Barge Haulers" to be his first professional painting and it is the work that defined him as a master documentarian of social inequality.
_	Siddharaja was so pleased with the work that he ordered it to be placed on the back of an elephant and paraded through the streets of Anhilwad Patan.
_	Volunteers make significant contributions to the Gallery, ultimately reducing the Gallery's expenses and increasing the scope of the work that can be completed.
_	Digital tourism fiction novels and short story can offer readers direct web links inside the work that lead to the websites of the real attractions.
_	Members play a role in assisting and highlighting the work that volunteer community groups play in New Zealand society by providing a day or half-day's labour at each organisation.
_	The peaceful countryside and a secure financial base provided an ideal environment for the work that followed.
_	The Association was already running a series of hospitals in the north of the country and Chalke believed it had the capacity and infrastructure to sustain the work that Oasis and GMTV had begun.
_	While as with globalization, deglobalization can refer to economic, trade, social, technological, cultural and political dimensions, much of the work that has been conducted in the study of deglobalization refers to the field of international economics.
_	Wholesale Grocers does the majority of the work that was performed by the two union-based distribution centers.
_	In the work books of the temple there is news of the work that was being done in the organs whether they were carving or painting, so Master Pierre performed the crowning of the small organ and Fernando de Carasa the doors of all the organs; Juan de Artega painted banisters and galleries of the organs and the choir, Villoldo painted the mediums and its box, the doors and the crowning of the little one in the year 1526, Juan Soreda, also in the same year, it is evident that he painted the large organs and again at age ten Pedro Villanueva was entrusted with the painting of "the doors and box of the large organs".
_	It is not the rarity or fame of the work that determines the price of a replica, only the cost of production.
_	Dixon consequently came out with his own translation of the work that was greatly based on Sōseki's translation.
_	The total cost of the work that had been done on the conversion to a CATOBAR configuration, and of reverting the design to the original STOVL configuration, was estimated by Philip Hammond to be "something in the order of £100 million".
_	The ENIAC proved that it operated faster than the Mark I, a well known electromechanical machine at Harvard, and also showed that the work that would take a "human computer" 40 hours to complete could be done in 20 seconds.
_	The next morning, Tāwhaki and the brothers-in-law return; seeing the canoe, the brothers-in-law are surprised by all the work that has been done.
_	"Harenchi Gakuen" is considered as probably the work that has had the most influence in the world of manga at the end of the 1960s, leading the newly born "Shōnen Jump" magazine to sell millions of copies per week.<ref name="HARENCHI GAKUEN / SCUOLA SENZA PUDORE"></ref>
_	However, in light of news outlets reporting his disinterest with Maker, PewDiePie tweeted, "I feel like I was misquoted in the "WSJ" and I'm really happy with the work that Maker has been doing for me."
_	Tribute to Éric Rohmer () (a.k.a. "Maurice Schérer") is a short 2010 video commissioned by Les Films du Losange as a tribute to Éric Rohmer by his friend and former colleague Jean-Luc Godard, and is the work that directly precedes the release of the 2010 feature "Film Socialisme" in Godard's filmography.
_	The model explains embedding by looking at the work that people do to make it possible.
_	hav’n’t they enough to do with their own blind and bochers, without bein’ put upon to do the work that belongs to St. Taff ?
_	Battle also performed the work that year at the Ravinia Festival with conductor John Nelson and the Chicago Symphony Orchestra.
_	The Duchess of Montrose visited the institution in 1925 and spoke positively of the work that was being achieved in Larbert.
_	As part of the work that OpenEJB did to prepare for the integration with Apple's WebObjects, a very large integration test suite was developed.
_	Writing about “Forest of Light” in the Washington Post, journalist Adrian Higgins said, "It is the sheer scale of the work that really touches the imagination…“Forest of Light” is strange and touching and authentic.
_	Pako with the work that had prepared with Juanma, decides to translate it into a new album: "Akí No Keda Ni Dios" published in 1994, dedicated to lost friends and bandmates, with songs that had been composed by Pako and Juanma before his death.
_	Performance work statement (or PWS) is to summarize the work that needs to be done for a contract (e.g., with the U.S. Department of Defense).
_	This was greatly enhanced by the camaraderie and espirit-de-corps of the members of the Corps, knowing the high military value and high quality of the work that they produced.
_	It was in the military prison in Bonne-Nouvelle, a district of Rouen, from February to May, that Weil completed the work that made his reputation.
_	The department of Indian Affairs repeatedly refused his desires to speak directly to Parliament, and did not pay for the work that the League was attempting to do.
_	After the work that removed the dam finished in February 2006, the lake fell back to its historic creek levels, allowing the Cape Fear Shiner to expand its range back into several miles of river that was previously unsuitable for inhabitation because of the dam.
_	As of October 2016, most of the work that had been done on the role of gut flora in the gut-brain axis had been conducted in animals, or on characterizing the various neuroactive compounds that gut flora can produce.
_	In this view, the amount of work that can exist is infinite, but (1) machines can do most of the "easy" work, (2) the definition of what is "easy" expands as information technology progresses, and (3) the work that lies beyond "easy" (the work that requires more skill, talent, knowledge, and insightful connections between pieces of knowledge) may require greater cognitive faculties than most humans are able to supply, as point 2 continually advances.
_	After the R101 tragedy, the work that had been planned for the R100 was cancelled, and Cox began working on the development of aeroplanes at the Royal Aircraft Establishment at Farnborough.
_	"Each of our local school districts {Taylor and Adair counties] are performing exceptionally well, and I want to congratulate the work that our local school districts have done," Carney added.
_	An Igorot family may purchase a roughly carved "bulul" from a tourist booth and use it for traditional ceremonies, thus giving authenticity to the work that would not, perhaps, be present otherwise.
_	James describes the quilts he made between 1992 and 1995 as a “last hurrah” for the strip-pieced panel technique, and it is for the work that he produced during this period that he is best known.
_	It includes the String Quintet in A minor Op. 9 that made his first reputation in Vienna, the Violin Sonata in D major Op. 25, two Piano Quintets in B-flat major, Op. 30 and C-sharp minor, Op. 54, the Cello Sonata Op. 39, and the work that first brought Goldmark's name into prominence in the Viennese musical world, the String Quartet in B-flat Op. 8 (his only work in that genre).
_	While working in the Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory he pioneered the work that later produced the first X-ray laser, which would later become important for the US Strategic Defense Initiative, popularly referred to as the "Star Wars" program.
_	By the mid-19th century, two Norwegian linguistic pioneers had started the work that would influence the linguistic situation to this day.
_	Following the inquiry, The Centre for Tomorrow’s Company (CTC or ‘Tomorrow’s Company’) was founded in 1996 to carry forward the work that started in the inquiry.
_	In the United States, founding father, Thomas Jefferson considered it a "poison" and was so critical of the work that he censored it from the University of Virginia library.
_	As Director of Research at the Wellcome Research Laboratories he presided over the discovery and development of lamotrigine (an anti-epileptic compound), atovaquone (an anti-malarial) and zomig (for treatment of migraine headaches), and initiated the work that resulted in the development of lapatinib for the treatment of breast cancer.
_	"Refutation of a Pamphlet Written by the Rev. John Mackey Entitled "A Method of Making a Cube a Double of a Cube, Founded on the Principles of Elementary Geometry", wherein His Principles Are Proved Erroneous and the Required Solution Not Yet Obtained" (1824) was the work that launched Murphy's career.
_	Although more work was needed before completion, it was decided to show off to the residents of Kern County the work that was accomplished.
_	After reading some of the work that Juliet wrote about the Society, a resident of Guernsey tells her that Elizabeth was no saint, hinting that Elizabeth was having sex with the Germans occupying the island to get luxuries.
_	Mark Choeke, writing for "Marketing Week" in December 2010, states that 'as industry champions go, these two are perfectly placed and sufficiently experienced to help rebuild trust and confidence in the work that marketers do.
_	The Europe PMC funders group requires that articles describing the results of biomedical and life sciences research they have supported be made freely available in Europe PMC within 6 months of publication to maximise the impact of the work that they fund.
_	She recorded the work that year for Turnabout/Vox Records.
_	In 1574, he attempted to reprint his "Vocabulary", an indispensable tool for evangelization in Nahuatl, but the Inquisition compelled him to restate sections of his introduction to the work that it considered to be incorrect.
_	"I think there is a fiduciary responsibility that the federal government has to looking after the Dogrib interests, and these are the arguments that we will use towards ensuring that the quality of water and the work that has to be done for the cleanup is done."
_	Fischer Black, who co-authored with them the work that was awarded, had died in 1995 and thus was not eligible for the prize.
_	Handel's two-act English version is the basis for the form of the work that is most often performed today, although modern productions typically use a different arrangement from the one that he himself actually devised.
_	Winners receive performances of a chamber work, either of the work that won the award, or a different work.
_	"Kishore Chandrananda Champu" has both Odia and Sanskrit compositions and it was the Odia part of the work that has been credited with cementing his literary reputation in the language.
_	Baptism is not a human work; it is the place where God does the work that only God can do."
_	Pinkerton constantly showed a deep trust in the work that Warne performed and acknowledges so in his memoirs.
_	Manual labour was a resource in high demand, as much of the work that today would be done with machines was still a manual affair in the 1930s and 1940s – shoveling, material handling, machining, and many others.
_	After hearing of the work that had been done so far, in 722 Gregory summoned Boniface back to Rome to answer rumours concerning Boniface’s doctrinal purity.
_	A month later, the work that began as an experiment in Brighton was officially recognised when the Private Members’ Small-Scale DAB Bill received Royal Assent to pass into law as an Act of Parliament.
_	During the Sassanid Empire, Ardeshir ordered Tansar, his high priest, to finish the work that King Valax had started.
_	However, if the work that is distributed by the remixer is an entirely new and transformative work that is not for profit, copyright laws are not breached.
_	The ultimate scientific objective of the method has been described as "test[ing] theoretical findings against real-world data in ways that permit empirically supported theories to cumulate over time, with each researcher's work building appropriately on the work that has gone before."
_	And I saw the effect it had on him, and that's when I decided I never wanted to be a celebrity at that level, and I think that's why I've chosen to do the work that I do and just kind of work with directors that I love and try and do work that means something to me."
_	The idea and the new technology, which resulted in the birth of the company, came from the work that Ferguson, Kroitor and Kerr had done producing the multi-screen National Film Board of Canada production "In the Labyrinth" and Ferguson's "Man and the Polar Regions" for Expo 67.
_	Pastor was very active in the work that led to the establishment of the church.
_	From March until May 2009, an exhibition by Wilson and Peter Dykhuis for the Dalhousie Art Gallery in Halifax provided a deeper meaning and understanding of the work that she has created through a number of still images and constructed characters that surround the interpretations that one may have to a certain type of person.
_	They more frequently lack assistance at home because it is common for the parents to not understand the work that is in English.
_	This is also connected with the dating of the work that some, in connection with the Klosterneuburg Altarpiece (1331) have pinpointed to the later period of John of Luxembourg (1340) while others judge it to be influenced by Italian art (such the picture The Crucifixion by Simone Martini of 1342) and consider it more likely to have been painted after 1350.
_	The results of the original efforts of RLG/NARA task force and the nestor working group to develop criteria for audit and certification of trustworthy digital repositories and the work that was led by the Center for Research Libraries (CRL) were foremost within the considerations throughout the development of the DRAMBORA toolkit, and in the DCC-led pilot audits that preceded it.
_	Unfortunately one religious body had refused to be represented on the commission, and the feeling that arose caused the work that had been done to be nullified for the time being.
_	Her first series with him was in ""El Ciudadano Gómez"" but the work that made her an icon is "Doña Espotaverderona", mother of "La Chimoltrufia" in the television program Chespirito.
_	Labor tax was the work that the people had to do without any remunerations or with meager stipends.
_	Chris' reaction to the situation threatens the work that he and Aidan have done to build up a strong relationship.
_	She is currently a national spokesperson for the American Heart Association’s Go Red for Women campaign, and she has traveled to Capitol Hill several times to speak with members of Congress regarding the work that must be done regarding heart disease.
_	The Court reasoned that barring the plaintiff from recovering for the work that he had done presented a disproportionate forfeiture.
_	A purpose derived from providing a product or service - An individual may derive purpose in life from the work that he or she completes.
_	All acknowledged "Genetics and the Origin of Species" as the direct instigator of all the work that followed.
_	On behalf of the committee, Bokor Hutasuhut drafting committee report on the work that has set the Cultural Manifesto consists of three parts: Cultural Manifesto, Manifesto Explanation of Culture, and Literature Pancasila .
_	It helped the team prioritize the work that still needed to be done, which increased the development speed for the remainder of the project.
_	"Spamalot" is the gaudy climax of a long, unfunny tradition of post-Python exploitation – books, actions figures, video games – that treats the old material as a series of slogans to be referenced without doing any of the work that made the lines so original in the first place."
_	The statue is another cast of the work that the artist created in 1938 and which has represented the state in the National Statuary Hall at the United States Capitol.
_	While Spiegelman was far from the first to do autobiography in comics, critics such as James Campbell considered "Maus" the work that popularized it.
_	In 1827 Ampère published his magnum opus, "Mémoire sur la théorie mathématique des phénomènes électrodynamiques uniquement déduite de l’experience" (Memoir on the Mathematical Theory of Electrodynamic Phenomena, Uniquely Deduced from Experience), the work that coined the name of his new science, "electrodynamics", and became known ever after as its founding treatise.
_	However, the Renaissance setting of "Zanetto" was a far cry from the gritty contemporary story he used for "Cavalleria rusticana", the work that made him famous.
_	The project of documenting this collection was based on the work that was done to document the IUPUI Public Art Collection, which was completed in the fall of 2009 and received national recognition.
_	"The Record" Endorsement "Rothman in the Ninth," published on October 29, 2002, stated that Rothman should "continue the work that benefits his constituents."
_	Recent works such as the "Exercise" series have increasingly featured simulated human figures, produced using Motion Capture, and have experimented with the use of algorithmic components to produce action within the work that is unforeseeable to the artist himself.
_	Several researchers have questioned however to what extent additional hours worked really increase the marginal productivity of labour; particularly in services, the work that gets done in five days could often also be done in four.
_	Much of the work that has been done involves restoring the atrium areas, processional corridors and the atrium chapels, where they still exist.
_	But what he learned was that the analysis of the transference was actually the work that needed to be done: "the transference, which, whether affectionate or hostile, seemed in every case to constitute the greatest threat to the treatment, becomes its best tool".
_	The Book of Abraham expands upon the nature of the priesthood in the Latter Day Saint movement, and it is suggested in the work that those who are foreordained to the priesthood earned this right by valor or nobility in the pre-mortal life.
_	It was "very, very bizarre start to my career and to the work that I was doing in Alabama."
_	In the fall of 2017, he established a new enterprise, the California Institute for Community, Art, and Nature (California ICAN) to continue and expand upon the work that he began more than forty years ago.
_	Later John Lloyd Stephen also he narrates his discoveries and adventures in the work that later published "Incidents of Travel in Mexico, Yucatan and Central America."
_	2) Frederic Remington, "The Broncho Buster" (1895) -- Remington's first attempt to model in bronze and the work that started him on a long secondary career as a sculptor.
_	Russian newspapers including "Pravda" featured supportive articles approving of the work that Detroit Poles were making, and singled Krzycki, Orlemanski, and Lange as heroic leaders.
_	Bruckner died "before completing" the work that is now played as his (unfinished) "Ninth Symphony", with the result that his symphonic total is eight if only the completed canonical works are counted – and ten if the list includes the early Study Symphony in F minor and the D minor Symphony now known as "No. 0" – both of them withdrawn by the composer.
_	Having appeared just months after Norris' death, critics took the opportunity in reviews of "The Pit" to mourn the tragic loss of the great "American Zola," so the novel received much more attention than any of the work that came before it.
_	There is additionally concern Pink has damaged the work that Tribal Huk did feeding a thousand Waikato schoolchildren.
_	Azar Nafisi, Iranian writer and academic, claims in her introduction to the 2006 English edition of the work that ""My Uncle Napoleon" is in many ways a refutation of the grim and hysterical images of Iran that have dominated the Western world for almost three decades.
_	This last part, as I read Murray, is largely imposed and disruptive, trying to pin a romantic political agenda to the work that's hardly there.
_	This position was used for editing purposes, but mostly the work that Janáček had provided, not necessarily the work of the other librettists.
_	Robyn Adams Gillam notes the work that Cabrol contributed to in the understanding of the temples of the New Kingdom, and her attention to political and religious symbolism.
_	President Cushing graduated an unusually large number of famous men: William Ballard Preston (Secretary of the Navy under President Zachary Taylor), Dr. Thomas Atkinson (Episcopal Bishop of the Diocese of North Carolina), Hugh A. Garland (U.S. Congressman and Clerk of the U.S. House of Representatives), William A. Daniel (Justice of the Virginia Supreme Court), Congressman William M. Tredway, Landon C. Garland (President of Randolph–Macon College and Chancellor of Vanderbilt University), Jesse Burton Harrison, who was a vocal opponent of slavery as well as a historian, who died too early to have produced the work that his talent suggested he would produce, Maryland Governor Thomas W. Ligon, Dr. John Lycan Kirkpatrick (President of Davidson College), and Dr. John M. P. Atkinson (President of Hampden–Sydney College]].
_	These introduce a setting of part of the vespers service for Christmas Day, the only portion of the work that is not in English:
_	A hard-working defensive midfielder, Coombs is described by former teammate Gilly Flaherty as "a real grafter and she'll put in the work that some people don't want to do."
_	The name of the record is a reference to the film "Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb" and a reflection of the band "being themselves and loving the work that they do".
_	The Art Show includes all of the work that students have made with the art teacher over the year as well as singing, guitar performances, and a performance by the school’s musical band.
_	By the start of the twentieth century, U.S. decisions on unfair competition found that representing as the author's work a version of the work that substantially departed from the original was a cause of action.
_	Envisioning the work that they desired to be accomplished from there, the new home for their work was named "Mount Carmel Center" after the place where Elijah called the Israelites back to worshiping God.
_	When pressed during the briefing by a reporter as to the chance of shuttle or crew loss, Shannon reported "I am 100 percent comfortable that the work that has been done, has accurately characterized the damage, and that we will have a very successful re-entry".
_	Consequently, Māgha is more admired as a poet than the work is as a whole, and the sections of the work that may be considered digressions from the story have the nature of an anthology and are more popular.
_	It's kind of like they are undoing all the work that was done earlier in the season."
_	It has been speculated that Marksman was murdered by Chicago Police officers for the work that he and his students were doing on police brutality in Chicago involving former Chicago police commander Jon Burge.
_	His "Pamiętnik" (Memoirs) was the work that he began shortly before his death, and that was never completely finished.
_	The miniature rendition (which stands tall) of the work that once struggled to find a home sold for $4,800 at a 2009 auction.
_	He wrote in a programme note for the work that he had sought "to suggest the revelries of the 'Hidden People' in the inmost deeps and hollow hills of Ireland".
_	Yurkevich was continuing the work that had been set out before him by his famous mentor Vladimir Soloviev.
_	Be known by the work that his industry rears;
_	In "Cracking Baseball’s Cold Cases," Morris describes some of the work that he and other members of the Society for American Baseball Research’s Biographical Committee do to fill out and correct details of nineteenth-century baseball players as listed in the Baseball Encyclopedia.
_	Saint Helena Island was famous for the work that Georg Forster and Johann Reinhold Forster performed on the famous Cook Voyage aboard the HMS "Resolution" in 1772.
_	A straight ball from Chris Gayle undid him, however, but Asim Kamal continued the work that Younis and Inzamam had started as they fluently and easily brought up 200.
_	King said there was "much work that we must do" and asked if we are "afraid, or are we truly committed to the work that must be done?"
_	It is likely that the "Suśruta-saṃhitā" was known to the scholar Dṛḍhabala (fl. 300–500 CE), which gives the latest date for the version of the work that has come down to us today.
_	The WAD paradigm stresses the relationship between women, and the work that they perform in their societies as economic agents in both the public and domestic spheres.
_	The government sent officials such as the samurai to monitor the work that was being done.
_	By 1911, his subsequent modifications allowed 36 people to do the work that it previously had taken 200 to accomplish and allowed them to compete in the mechanized marketplace.
_	Over the next 20 years Barlow laboriously reworked "The Vision", eventually expanding it from 4700 lines to 8350, building up a huge apparatus of prefaces and footnotes, and so altering the whole tenor of the work that it bore little resemblance to the original.
_	Under natural conditions, the work that they do in the nest is negligible compared to that done by workers.
_	In comments to Fox Business Channel, he said, "There are no profits for the work that writers do that is then digitized and distributed through the Internet".
_	A "texture/2D artist" adds texture to the work that has been created by the 3D modellers.
_	On two of the panels Homer painted scenes of mackerel fleets at Prouts Neck, one at dawn and the other at sunset; on the third he painted a grisaille study of the work that inspired "Eight Bells", which depicted a ship's officer standing alone, taking an observation with an octant.
_	The young Polish girl, according to the film, is good because she urges Chopin to drop the work that he loves and go out on a concert tour to collect money 'for the people', for a cause that is identified as national or revolutionary or both, and this is supposed to justify everything – so she demands that Chopin renounce his genius, sacrifice his composing and go out to entertain paying audiences – even though he hates concert playing, is ill with tuberculosis and has been warned by the doctors that the strain of a tour will kill him".
_	I don't know how many millions of dollars just the people in this room have made as a result of the work that these guys did."
_	Discovered in 1921, the two printed versions of the work that have been found were found in Paris and London, both of them being dated to sometime in 1789.
_	During this time he took considerable interest in the work that Robert Rauschenberg was producing at Gemini G.E.L. in West Hollywood, visiting him on several occasions and finding inspiration in the accomplishments of the painter.
_	TL@SUTD complements the work that is currently undertaken at the DSO National Laboratories, NUS, NTU and other research establishments.
_	This council proved so incapable of doing the work that in 1547, when the Act was repealed, it made no difference to the legality of royal proclamations.
_	Unfortunately, the work that he created was lost.
_	Scott Witlin, a lawyer representing the video game companies, stated that the work provided by actors "represent less than one tenth of 1 percent of the work that goes into making a video game", and thus their demands were excessive.
_	And that kind of pressure, after all the work that I've done, really isn't like anything I need in my life right now."
_	Furious about Lord Kitchener's use of scorched earth tactics and concentration camps against the Boers, he also continued the work that he had started during the height of the war with Emily Hobhouse, exposing the atrocities and setting up institutions for the rehabilitation of survivors.
_	In April 2014, Aiko began recording her interviews in order to put something together to show her fan base the process of the album and "the work that went into it, and little random things."
_	The producers, however, announced that "The show is on schedule and we are very thrilled about the work that was done in Florida."
_	Another Slitheen shows up (Callis, the aunt of Ecktosca and Dram), and the three of them, the Doctor, Rose, Robsen, and Flowers head back to Justice Alpha to destroy the work that was done at SCAT-house.
_	NewSouth Books received media attention for publishing an expurgated edition of the work that censored the words "nigger" and "Injun".
_	The guiding notion of listening does not appear to limit the sources of the work that flipped eye publishes.
_	Given the fact that the price was marketed for so low was an indication for the quality of the work that would be flushed out within the publication.
_	His son Vićentije Vuković inherited the press and continued doing the work that his father started.
_	Doing the work that others want to do least are considered sincere in the eyes of God.
_	At this school Moore discovered that the work that he had been doing for over a decade was called performance art.
_	By then, the Assembly of Antioquia, through Ordinance number 10, authorized the governor of the Department, Alberto Jaramillo Sánchez, to promote the construction of the work that would translate the ideals of the "Company of the Hotel Nutibara SA", on April 22, 1936 .
_	I had the opportunity to review the work that he did for the Embassy in New Delhi, and I was impressed with the richness and flexibility of his imagination and the quality of his mind, which is free and spirited."
_	In 2005, Vasilescu and Terzopoulos introduced the Multilinear PCA terminology as a way to better differentiate between linear and multilinear tensor decomposition, as well as, to better differentiate between the work that computed 2nd order statistics associated with each data tensor mode(axis), and subsequent work on Multilinear Independent Component Analysis that computed higher order statistics associated with each tensor mode/axis.
_	Brian M. Stableford thought it "an eccentric story" and like the rest of "the work that de Camp [did] for Unknown ... quite impressive."
_	"Portland Monthly" called the sculpture's design "sweetly curved yet architecturally stark", and said it serves as a "marvelous example of the work that has made [Kelly] one of the most in demand artists in the region.
_	In 424, he brought the work that resulted from these visions to the court of the Northern Wei dynasty.
_	A part of the work that remained with his family when he left the Netherlands must be considered lost, and the remaining early works of Vincent van Gogh tell an incomplete story.
_	The mission paved the way for the Salyut space station missions, investigating the effects of long-term weightlessness on crew, and evaluating the work that the cosmonauts could do in orbit, individually and as a team.
_	In "The New York Times", Katherine Knorr wrote that “Bawer is one of the best literary critics in America today,” who proves “that the best literary criticism comes from a serious, close reading of the work that avoids the temptations of celebrity and fashionable politics.
_	The play contains several gibes at Scotland and the Scottish people, which has led some critics to think that it is the work that incited George Nicolson, Queen Elizabeth's agent in Edinburgh, to protest against the portrayal of Scots on the London stage in a 1598 letter to William Cecil, Lord Burghley.
_	Most of the work that the organization carries out is done in El Porvenir, an impoverished district of Trujillo.
_	However, Louis was so pleased with the work that he kept the original and commissioned a copy to be sent to his grandson.
_	On August 3, Democratic candidate Bernie Sanders, who had previously declared his support for public financing, recorded a video endorsing the work that Democracy Matters was doing and reiterated the need for campaign finance reform.
_	The atmosphere working group regards the work that it is conducting for the International Arctic Science Committee as a way to further promote science research within the Arctic region.
_	However Coverdale remained in Devon for several more months, helping to pacify the people and doing the work that properly belonged to the Bishop of Exeter.
_	Hermeticism is a historiographical term describing the work that attempts to reconstruct the mode of thought held by 17th century scientists.
_	IPF has undertaken other projects to promote awareness of the work that needs to be done at the pass to protect its distinctive environment.
_	The organization was featured in Academy Award-winning documentary “Saving Face” about the work that the charity does in helping victims of Pakistani acid attacks.
_	The work was mainly appreciated for its chapters on the analysis of the smelting of iron and copper, and it was the work that gave Swedenborg his international reputation.
_	Gautier has told how she was put to one side by Turpin and by Lejeune who claimed responsibility for the discovery, even though it relied on the work that she had initiated and directed technically.
_	John R. Coyne opines that "Selected Letters" is a "well-written and thoughtful study so comprehensive that it seemed to obviate the need for any further biographical data," and Ronald Fried states that his letters shows Mailer's almost innocent notion that he could make the world better and they emerge "as essential to the work that would become his indelible contribution to America literature."
_	Upward mobility is particularly difficult for migrant domestic workers because their opportunities are often limited by their illegal status putting a very definite limitation on the work that is available to them as well as their power to negotiate with employers
_	Furthermore, she also argues that in this economic model superfluous jobs are prevailed, while the work that makes possible the maintenance of human life, such as agricultural production or reproductive labor, are completely precarious or directly excluided from any remuneration.
_	The French Billionaire had acquired the work that was displayed around the same time as Damien Hirst's diamond-encrusted skull "For the Love of God" at White Cube.
_	Charles Herbert Gough was so impressed by the work that he initiated a public subscription to purchase the portrait as a gift for the mayor from the citizens of Brisbane.
_	The three other Trondheim newspapers barely mentioned the event with a small notice from central authorities: ""Arbeider-Avisen" has lately repeatedly published articles and messages that only has had the intention of giving an unwanted influence on the newspaper's readers, and by that evading civil obedience, at the same time it is damaging the work that Norwegian and German authorities are conducting in cooperation.
_	It reverses or halts the effects of the work that has been done to improve health care in these countries, and although smoking is deemed as a "voluntary" health risk, the marketing of tobacco towards very impressionable adolescents in the developing world makes it less of a voluntary action and more of an inevitable shift.
_	In 1608 he began his first mission, to the island of Ouessant, returning to the work that St. Vincent Ferrer had initiated early in the 15th century in Brittany.
_	In 2012 and 2013, Emma was a judge on the digital Emmy’s in recognition for the work that she has done in the space of digital content.
_	It is probably the work that best reflects the evolution of Chandavarkar's scholarship in recent years.
_	He has been called "computing's Johnny Appleseed", for planting the seeds of computing in the digital age; Robert Taylor, founder of Xerox PARC's Computer Science Laboratory and Digital Equipment Corporation's Systems Research Center, noted that "most of the significant advances in computer technology—including the work that my group did at Xerox PARC—were simply extrapolations of Lick's vision.
_	Others distinguish e-Science as the work that is done using the cyberinfrastructure.
_	The original settlers had a hard time keeping up with all the work that needed to be done.
_	Although Philo liked to withdraw from the world in order to give himself up entirely to contemplation, and bitterly regretted the lack of such repose ("De Specialibus Legibus," 1 [ii. 299]), he did not abandon the work that was required of him by the welfare of his people.
_	But the work that ensured his breakthrough was the work on the theory of acting "Letters from an old actor to his son" ("Breve fra en gammel Skuespiller til hans søn" 1782) which especially asserts Denis Diderot's love of a mixture of moralizing and naturalism in plays.
_	Written in 1997 "An archeological Survey of the Shoulderbone Tract, Hancock County, Georgia" describes the work that was done in the Shoulderbone Tract of Hancock County which was made up a mound complex located on a terrace north of Whitten Creek.
_	Although parts date from the 13th and 14th centuries the interior, as it is seen today, shows the work that was carried out in the mid 19th century.
_	At independence, the Indian St John Council was granted entire control over the work that was being carried out in 526 divisions.
_	With more of its families consisting of two parents with full-time careers and raising a family, fewer members were available to volunteer, and Beth El began to hiring employees to do the work that volunteers had always done.
_	Morisseau has said that music plays a huge part in her work and often informs the work that she is writing.
_	However, subsequent editors, beginning with Angelo Geremia, so enlarged the work that it came to be considered a general bibliography of Italian literature.
_	In a letter to Murdoch, Ailes wrote: "I will not allow my presence to become a distraction from the work that must be done every day to ensure that Fox News and Fox Business continue to lead our industry."
_	After a brief stay at the University of Cambridge, he went on to the University of Copenhagen, where "he explained to Bohr and Kramers his idea (that was) a sort of forerunner of the duality principle, (hence) the celebrated paper" on the work that others dubbed the Bohr-Kramers-Slater (BKS) theory.
_	Public funds helped to fund all of the work that was done.
_	Ford looked to translate the work that had gone into the Ford Mustang Boss 302 into the local Falcon model with the car using a fuel injected and much higher developed Cleveland V8 engine.
_	Jones said the work that needed to be done to improve the football facilities and the campus in general would never get done with him still there.
_	Of the event Sturt wrote "I little thought when I was engaged in the work that I was erecting Mr. Poole's monument, but so it was.
_	This description of an upper bound to the work that may be done by an engine was the earliest modern formulation of the second law of thermodynamics.
_	Rudolf Arnheim commented on the work that "The photographs … combine documentary impact with a pictorial originality and beauty that is always strictly at the service of the subject, its meaning and mood."
_	Charles Herbert Gough was so impressed by the work that he initiated a public subscription to purchase the portrait as a gift for the mayor from the citizens of Brisbane.
_	In 1934, choreographer Vasili Vainonen staged a version of the work that addressed many of the criticisms of the original 1892 production by casting adult dancers in the roles of Clara and the Prince, as Gorsky had.
_	You could then watch the work that was going on in the mall before it completely opened.
_	In beginning the parallel description of the Tabernacle’s construction that corresponds to the instructions given in Parashah Terumah, Moses explicitly brought together all the community of Israel, including both men and women, as confirmed by “men and women, all whose hearts moved them, all who would make an offering”; “all the skilled women spun with their own hands and brought what they had spun . . . ; and all the women who excelled in that skill spun the goats’ hair”; and “thus the Israelites, all the men and women whose hearts moved them to bring anything for the work that the Lord, through Moses, had commanded to be done, brought it as a freewill offering to the Lord.”
_	The build was subject to considerable controversy because the council was adamant that the site was required for future dwelling-houses and residential buildings which then led them refusing planning permission and subsequently putting a ban on the work that had already started.
_	Initially, some within the World Health Organization had criticized IHME for trying to do the work that WHO already does.
_	All Rootes products had to be approved by Lord Rootes, who was reportedly "very grumpy" when he learned of the work that had gone into the Tiger project without his knowledge.
_	Sydney Metro was cancelled in February 2010, with Premier Keneally saying "We've listened to the community and made a tough decision," and pledging to reimburse tenderers and property owners for losses incurred as a result of the work that had occurred to that point.
_	By looking at three major types of receptors, (G protein coupled receptors, receptor tyrosine kinases, and ion channel receptors) scientists are able to see how trans-membrane receptors contribute to the complexity of cells and the work that these cells do.
_	The writers commissioned to produce the work that became "Confidentially Yours" were, Janis Balodis, Andrew Bovell, Nick Enright, Michael Gurr, Daniel Keene, Joanna Murray-Smith and Debra Oswald.
_	Jagadguru Rambhadracharya mentions in the prologue of the work that he was traveling to Madhya Pradesh from Chitrakuta on November 25, 2007.
_	By the 1990s, though, the battle still raged – although local unions had been able to negotiate relatively soft landings for those craft workers now deemed expendable (through buyouts and various severance packages) and relatively high wages (through regular advances and productivity payments designed to share cost-cutting gains), the fact remained that two crew members – and engineer and a conductor –could now do the work that five had done previously.
_	Roberts offered the poem to Edward when they were engaged, and such was the quality of the work that he put into it—the independent brilliant piano part, the voice in turn subtle and heroic—that it won the first prize of £5 in a competition organised by the publishers Joseph Williams.
_	While at Discovery, Koppel produced several lengthy documentaries on a variety of subjects including a 2008 four-hour miniseries on China, which Koppel "ranks with some of the work that <nowiki>[he is]</nowiki> most proud of over the years."
_	He contends in the work that Shakespeare "invented" humanity, in that he prescribed the now-common practice of "overhearing" ourselves, which drives our own internal psychological development.
_	Byron Adams says of the work that its "orgiastic power, coruscating malice, sensuous desolation and extroverted swagger" make the symphony a tribute to Walton's tenacity and inventive facility.
_	Porter then went on to do research at the University of Cambridge supervised by Ronald George Wreyford Norrish where he began the work that ultimately led to them becoming Nobel Laureates.
_	An editorial by the publishers on his departure explained that they were impressed with the work that he had done, and regretted that "Justice Department persecution of publishers of erotica" had caused him to terminate the relationship.
_	"She and Her Cat" was the work that made Shinkai popular and it led him to work on the production company CoMix Wave Films, for which he produced his other films.
_	However a federal investigation into Japanese propaganda which was launched in November 1941 discovered the work that the Japanese Committee on Trade and Information had undertaken from 1937 to 1940.
_	For others, the term was too broad, focusing on a general type of collection rather than the work that the special librarian does.
_	Much of the work that has been going on in electric grid modernization, especially substation and distribution automation, is now included in the general concept of the smart grid.
_	Bradfisch had no doubts about the work that lay ahead.
_	This brings together the vertical (hierarchical) view of an organisation and the horizontal (product or project) view of the work that it does visible to the outside world.
_	It took three years to complete all the work that was essential.
_	The production company promised to cover all damages caused by the 3:45 am incident, but the work that was done was done badly and remains incomplete twenty-eight months later.
_	Allaham singled out for praise the help for Qatar provided by ZOA president Klein, noting in a June 21, 2018 "Jerusalem Post" report that he was "proud of the work that Mort Klein has done... in collaboration with the Emir and other members of the Qatari Royal Family."
_	Black feminists believed that, "cross-racial struggle made clear the work that white women needed to do in order for cross-racial sisterhood to really be powerful."
_	He had already been working on TVE since 1963, directing several previous series like "Estudio 3" and "Mañana puede ser verdad", but this was the work that made him famous for the Spanish public.
_	In 2014 Hostage UK’s work was recognised by the UK government when Hostage UK’s director Rachel Briggs was appointed an OBE in recognition of the work that Hostage UK do.
_	We look forward to continuing the dialogue with Muslim communities and supporting the work that they are undertaking.
_	At that time the work that computers could perform was limited by their lack of real memory storage capacity.
_	This perspective concentrates on the work that needs to be done in society by people of all faiths.
_	He believed that if it were used in conjunction with the Crossley reflector it would make that facility competitive for at least some of the work that Humason and Hubble were doing with the larger Mt. Wilson telescopes.
_	You've got to recognize the work that he's done and the value he's given to society.
_	It was designed by Juan Martínez de la Villa in 1851, raising the cost of the work to 462,000 reales, which were partly borne by the Dukes of Montpensier (Infanta Luisa Fernanda and Antoine d'Orléans), promoters of the work that was inaugurated on 1 December 1855.
_	On this he commented that he liked “landscapes that suggest prehistory”, and this is borne out by the original conceptual drawing of the work that includes an inset map of the continent sited off the coast of Africa and at the straits into the Mediterranean.
_	"I am so thankful for the work that Christ’s Object Lessons has accomplished and is still accomplishing.
_	This was due to all the work that was put in getting the ground ready for the 2013 season and particularly the finishing work that was done on the new pavilion.
_	Since then, she won the SkyPa On Demand Adult Award and the Yukan Fuji Award, starred in the work that won Best Picture, and became the first, in the twelve-year history of the awards, to win or be involved in four major awards.
_	There is an impressionistic quality to the work that recalls the pointillism of Seurat and the feverish brush strokes of van Gogh.
_	The result of the friendly competition was the work that would set Crane upon her distinguished path – the novel "Emily Chester".
_	Depending on the jurisdiction, limitations may exist in projects in the work that an architectural designer is permitted to perform without direct supervision from a registered architect.
_	Up until 1996 the work that has been described in this article went under different labels.
_	They joined the two Tahitian missionaries and their congregation on the first Sunday at Mount Zion, and were appreciative of the work that had been done.
_	Nonetheless, for the work that he had done, the Republic offered du Perron its thanks.
_	The Kapell recording became a jukebox favourite, and Kapell was so associated with the work that he was often called "Khachaturian Kapell".
_	After the accidental death of his free-spirited pregnant wife, Penny, reserved architect Henry struggles to find meaning in his life and in the work that once consumed him.
_	She and Alan are rescued by her grandsons, allowing Grandma to see first hand the work that her family did, and she moved into the Tracy home ("Move And You're Dead").
_	Hopper stated, "With the work that I do with Clint, his movies are basically everyday life, so the costumes that I deal with are everyday clothes.
_	This document is of fundamental importance, making it possible to lend greater visibility to the work that is in fact accomplished while providing the user with a chance to embrace his or her project more fully.
_	Following glaciological work by the British Antarctic Survey (BAS), 1980–81, the feature was named by the UK Antarctic Place-Names Committee after David M. Burkitt, a BAS general assistant who assisted in the work that season, and was a member of the Joint Services Expedition to Elephant Island, 1970–71.
_	It believes that the work that Christ began must be continued to bring humanity to complete reconciliation with God.
_	As such the speaker coordinates the work that takes place in the Riksdag.
_	After they had excavated the site the work that Connah had done showed to have poor visibility of the stratification.
_	Nicolas Perrot, who was sent by Father Claude-Jean Allouez, continued the work that Nicolet had started.
_	He was responsible for much of the work that ensured the crew's survival after their ship, the "Endurance", was destroyed when it became trapped in pack ice in the Weddell Sea.
_	Predicts that soon the great office buildings will be turned into residences and that all the work that had been done in them will be done in the basements of a few buildings.
_	As the moniker implies, he is best recognized for making humorous, pun-themed work related to popular culture icons and putting those images on the street; for instance, in the work that inspired his artist name, Hanksy combined the body of fellow underground artist Banksy's classic rat with a cartoon face of actor Tom Hanks.
_	The goalies split the work that first season and led the Flyers to a first-place finish in the NHL's Western Division.
_	These videos gave the viewer an insight into the work that went on behind the scenes of "WAR", often showcasing development screens and concept art for the game.
_	Most of the work that was published in his lifetime appeared in either "Astounding" or "Wonder Stories".
_	Lightfoot chose not to adapt any specific version of the character from the comics and instead looked to the work that was done in "Daredevil" defining the character.
_	This stems from multiple factors: one being that lack of adequate education received due to less than quality book conditions, and the second being that most of the work that was available to African Americans with sub-par education at this time were positions that didn't pay well.
_	One of Calder’s first mobiles, "Mobile" (1938) was the work that "proved" to many art historians that Man Ray had an obvious influence on Calder’s style.
_	That year, he conceived and began to execute the work that would form his largest exhibition to date.
_	The North American English use of the term "trolley" instead of "tram" for a street railway vehicle derives from the work that Sprague did in Richmond and quickly
_	Newell later commented that he was impressed with the DigiPen team as "they had actually carried the concept through", already having included the interaction between portals and physics, completing most of the work that Valve would have had to commit on their own.
_	In addition to mentioning the work that Sullivan was doing for him, Mr. Shaver mentioned Sullivan's Transportation Building at the 1893 World Columbian Exposition, the Auditorium Hotel and Carson Pirie Scott in Chicago, with special mention of the National Farmer's Bank of Owatonna, Minnesota and the fact that Mr. Sullivan was decorated for his work by the French government.
_	Indeed, it might be said that much of the machinery of what has been called "liberal peacebuilding" by a number of scholars and "statebuilding" by another is based largely on the work that has been carried out in this area.
_	It was a condition of the work that at least two sides of each building be shown and, ideally, with the entrance visible.
_	Some of the work that she does is collaborative, while others, she likes to do on her own time.
_	He was inspired by the work that had been done at the German Bauhaus and in 1937 was invited to teach photography at the New Bauhaus being founded by Moholy-Nagy in Chicago.
_	Numerous people, including her students and colleagues, are constantly inspired by Franzini-Armstrong and all the work that she does.
_	Hysteresis, in this case, refers to the restructuring of the adhesive interface over some period of time, with the result being that the work needed to separate two surfaces is greater than the work that was gained by bringing them together (W > γ + γ).
_	The time for such an algorithm can be expressed by adding the work that they perform at the top level of their recursion (to divide the problems into subproblems and then combine the subproblem solutions) together with the time made in the recursive calls of the algorithm.
_	The colored lights added a certain volume, experience, and mood to the work that Kraft found previously lacking.
_	At age 83, I have a range and variety of expression and imagery and feel a command over the work that has taken over sixty years to acquire.
_	He added that Stalin "needed little if any assistance in those important sections of the work that dealt with the Bund and the national question in the Transcaucasus."
_	The film then notes the work that is being done, interspersed with footage of two men kissing, but indicates that there is not enough support.
_	To sum up the matter in a few words, the work that we have begun in Central America will put Tulane University on the map as having the greatest department in the country on Maya Indian study.”
_	Beals' initial research for the part focused more on the woman's profession as an art museum director than on her life as a lesbian; "I was much more obsessed by the work that Bette did, because she was so obsessed by the work that she did."
_	Nazir-Ali said, "the reason behind some of the difficulties I was facing was removed when General Zia was killed - unfortunately for him, and I am now not doing the work that I was doing at the time with the very poor".
_	Shimon Jeselsohn, a law colleague of Marum in Germany who immigrated to Israel after the war, read about the museum's acquisition of the manuscript and connected it with the work that he had seen in Marum's possession.
_	Similarly, both the parashah and the haftarah in report the finishing of the leaders' work: "Moses finished the work" (וַיְכַל מֹשֶׁה, אֶת-הַמְּלָאכָה, "vayechal Mosheh et ha-melachah") in and "all the work that king Solomon wrought . . . was finished" (, "vatishlam kol ha-melachah asher asah ha-melech Shlomoh") in And in both the parashah and the haftarah, a cloud and the Presence of the Lord fill the Sanctuary, indicating God's approval.
_	However, the Venetian press that printed the second and third editions of his "Dialoghi" in 1541 and 1545 claimed on the first pages of the work that the author had converted to Christianity: “Dialoghi di Amore composti per Leone Medico, di Natione Hebreo, et di poi fatto Christiano” (Dialogues of Love, composed by Doctor Leon, of Hebrew heritage, and who later became Christian).
_	Italy has no set minimum wage but an employee's salary must be reflective of their quantity and quality of the work that they present.
_	During the March tour, Haley recorded several tracks in London for his next album for Sonet, completing the work that summer in Muscle Shoals; the album, "Everyone Can Rock & Roll", issued later in 1979, was the last release of new recordings by Haley before his death.
_	As Hal Foster warned in the mid-1990s, 'the institution may overshadow the work that it otherwise highlights: it becomes the spectacle, it collects the cultural capital, and the director-curator becomes the star.'"
_	All of the work that Hall did in the field of psychology and for psychology in the United States of America allowed for all the other psychologists to follow in his foot steps and to become psychologists in the United States.
_	And don’t worry too much about what happens to the work that you do display on the Internet, because a “thief” might well be doing you as much good as harm.
_	President Washington celebrated with the people but he realized the work that they would have to do in order to secure America’s future.
_	O'Hare decided to stop the comic because he felt he was not able to put in the work that the comic deserved, but noted that he would be willing to bring the comic back if given the chance.
_	He saw the popularity of the show as a vindication of the work that he had been sponsoring at 291 for the past five years.
_	The album falls short of the work that Sho Baraka has done on Reach Records or with the 116 Clique.
_	If granted the literary rights of Stieg Larsson's "Millennium series", however, Gabrielsson explains that she is not sure that it is fair for a ghostwriter to complete the work that Larsson had started.
_	Like other Charles Fauvel designs, it was a tailless aircraft, in this case inspired by the work that German firms had done on producing motorised versions of his AV.36 design.
_	LaFrance criticized the presence of the "work published before 1923" defense but not other factual challenges to the copyright status of the work that she said could just as easily be resolved through the appeal process.
_	In 2003 Marian left her firm and "strategic design" behind to embark on the work that she has since become internationally known for.
_	Joseph Szigeti was in the audience, and was so impressed with the work that he took the Concerto into his repertory.
_	Upon his arrival on the West Coast, he visited locations from Alaska to the Mexican border in order to analyze the work that would be needed.
_	He also composed an overture for the work that he based on the themes of the opera.
_	However, Oniroku Dan's S&M novel "Flower and Snake", is the work that made him famous.
_	After leaving the company, he composed the soundtrack to 2001's "", which was his first orchestral score and the work that he said put him on the map as a video game composer.
_	Mock told BuzzFeed that Morgan did not "really want to talk about trans issues, he wants to sensationalize my life and not really talk about the work that I do and what the purpose of me writing this book was about."
_	Individuals engaged in task roles focus on the goals of the group and on enabling the work that members do; examples of task roles include coordinator, recorder, critic, or technician.
_	Later, at the MRC Laboratory of Molecular Biology in Cambridge, England, Altman started the work that led to the discovery of RNase P and the enzymatic properties of the RNA subunit of that enzyme.
_	In 2004, there was a carved stone cross, a Khatchkar, given to the church in memory of the work that the rector had done for Armenia.
_	The composer's wife Alma Mahler, in her memoirs, says that for a fortnight Mahler was "haunted by the spectre of failing inspiration"; Mahler's recollection, however, is that on the first day of the vacation he was seized by the creative spirit, and plunged immediately into composition of the work that would become his Eighth Symphony.
_	According to a story in the work that related the origins of this latter group of Amazons, the Germanic King Taurer (a descendant of the earlier King Alemann) was faced with a rising population, leading him to lead groups of people south into Hungary and down the Danube to a place near the Black Sea to resettle them.
_	John Diliberto wrote of the work that Scott is "a bassist who takes leads, playing vocal melody lines that perfectly suit his fretless bass style ...
_	Similarly, Rabbi asked Rabbi Ishmael the son of Rabbi Jose if he had learned from his father the actual meaning of "And on the seventh day God finished the work that He had been doing" (for surely God finished God's work on the sixth day, not the Sabbath).
_	Implementation of multitasking in iOS has been criticized for its approach, which limits the work that applications in the background can perform to a limited function set and requires application developers to add explicit support for it.
_	He said that he had "never seen politics as a lifelong career" and "decided to make this decision now because I want these next 18 months to be about the work that we still have to do."
_	Even with his cowardly ways, he is an incredibly powerful wizard by Ingary standards, capable of matching the Witch of the Waste and is only not known as such because he wants to avoid the work that comes with the respect.
_	Theoretically, when looked at by different individuals at the same time, the work that each spectator sees by representing only one out of infinite possibilities will offer a new dimension and reality in each instance.
_	In the liner notes for the reissue, Dave Marsh called it "the greatest rock and roll album of its era" and "the Who's consummate masterpiece, the work that holds together most tightly as concept and realization".
_	However the work that caused the largest stir and the most controversy was a series of studies in collaboration with Diane F. Halpern which showed that left-handers have shorter life spans, often dying younger because of accidents or problems associated with a compromised immune system (possibly a long-term consequence of birth stress related trauma).
_	The ultimate scientific objective of the method is to "test theoretical findings against real-world data in ways that permit empirically supported theories to cumulate over time, with each researcher’s work building appropriately on the work that has gone before."
_	Therefore, others opted to either continue to work with the older traditional arrangements, if only for practical reasons, or to lump all of the genera together in the Elapidae, with no taxonomic subdivisions, to reflect the work that remains to be done.
_	Most of the work that used to take place in Dell's U.S. plants was transferred to contract manufacturers in Asia and Mexico, or some of Dell's own factories overseas.
_	If it is a reoccurring issue with a Cadet, or a very severe case of fighting or possession of tobacco products, the cadet can receive ISS (In-School-Suspension), where he sits in the military office and receive 0's on all of the work that is missed.
_	She usually does all the work that the partners in the firm cannot be bothered to do, such as filling out thousands of public opinion polls in different handwritings, though she will only agree to do something if it can be twisted into one of the 'nine levels of competence' of her NVQ.
_	In some ways, Pianka's own research program expands upon and continues the work that he and MacArthur began.
_	The author himself was aware of that, and notes at the beginning of the work that Muslim power had been "greatly cut back", and that his instructions might "not find application in the eastern regions at the present time", but that they would be "readily available" should a need for them arise in the future.
_	When Younes learns that Salim is Jewish and sees the work that the people of the mosque are doing, he stops collaborating with the police.
_	Between 1911 and 1913, Hess undertook the work that won him the Nobel Prize in Physics in 1936.
_	These fueled an enthusiasm for the work that has not since lapsed.
_	Beginning in 2000, the Athens, Ohio chapter of the National Alliance on Mental Illness (NAMI) started the reclamation for the cemeteries, taking on the work that was once the responsibility of the Ohio Department of Mental Health.”
_	He also holds the work that his brother has done for the Kennedy electorate and elsewhere in high regard.
_	Additionally as mentioned above the environment of decomposition is largely influential on the compounds present and the work that has been completed on decomposition thus far have studied it in a vastly different setting from the circumstances present in this case.
_	The feminist art group Sisters of Jam (Mikaela & Moa Krestesen) turned the necklace into a mobile monument; they see the eye bolt "as a symbol for the work already done but also as an encouragement for the work that is not yet completed."
_	Stacey noted that the women were valued in the work that they did, but that the committee felt that women were not normally included unless their contribution was essential.
_	There is an "undertone" of exclusion at this point in the work that, perhaps, leads to the question of the sexuality of The Pardoner and the social boundaries at hand.
_	On the next day, Tartaj returned to shed some light on the work that went on behind the scenes.
_	Such an artist holds a respected position in tribal society because of the work that he or she creates, embodying not only complex craft techniques but also spiritual/social and symbolic knowledge.
_	In 2014 WES set up an outreach programme called Magnificent Women (and their flying machines) which replicates the work that women did during the First World War in making aircraft wings, and this is aimed at secondary school girls.
_	A film of the election was made by candidate and filmmaker John Walsh entitled "ToryBoy The Movie", exploring the candidate's selection process and the work that goes into an election campaign.
_	The anonymous donor requested to honor the work that Sandberg had done to promote Modern Art in Israel and with the intension of supporting the proliferation of art in Israel.
_	New industrial processes and markets also gave rise, however, to many small shops in which semiskilled and unskilled workers did a discrete portion of the work that a skilled worker might have done a decade earlier.
_	I read Iqbal’s story in a Vanity Fair feature after his death and realized the work that needed to be done in his memory".
_	Segrè then remembered the work that Wu had done at Berkeley on the radioactive isotopes of xenon.
_	Often the work that results in a Federal 100 award is something that is difficult, time-consuming and, in many cases, beyond the winner’s job description.
_	The Chamber of Commerce of Montana monitors the work that the Auditor does.
_	It is important to recognize the work that Helen and the students produced for "An Ecological Nerve Center" as politically entangled, unspectacular, and strong because of it.
_	An engraving by Giovanni Battista Falda records the work that had been completed at the time of Alexander's death in 1667.
_	On June 21, Allaham told the "Jerusalem Post" that he is "proud of the work that Mort Klein has done and all the other Jewish leaders working in collaboration with the Emir and other members of the Qatari Royal Family."
_	I would be a doing huge disservice to Darla if I didn’t allow her to do the work that she does and to help add to that element that’s so important to Darla, which is her strength."
_	"Salon" faulted Offit for minimizing the work that autism advocacy groups have done to raise awareness, create support networks, and obtain research funding; the review noted that Offit focuses instead on aggressive and scientifically "slanted" groups like Defeat Autism Now! and Generation Rescue.
_	A long interval passed before Saxton’s next book, "Paper Chase" (1964), which has the distinction of "not" being the work that served as the basis for the later movie and television series (that honor goes to John Jay Osborn, Jr.’s similarly titled "The Paper Chase" (1970).
_	While the content and aesthetic of Hsu's works are postmodern, he maintains the traditional relationship between calligraphy and Zen practice, focusing on the act of painting as opposed to the work that is created
_	During his life, Juliá continued the work that was done by his parents during his childhood, cooperating with social and educational activities.
_	In 2002 he published "Theory and practice of personal success," the work that reveals the basic principles of success in both work and personal life.
_	This was the first live performance of the work that Adams himself heard, as an eye condition and resulting surgery caused him to miss the world premiere in Seattle.
_	John Kerr, writing in "A Most Dangerous Method" (1993), identified Grünbaum's book as the work that "has come to define contemporary debate over the evidentiary status of Freud's claims."
_	In that post, he continued the work that had been started by Bernini on the outside colonnade and the Ponte Sant’Angelo.
_	He wrote at the end of the work that he had "laid my axe to the virgin and rough wood and cut for the royal buildings timber that a more skilled builder may smooth with his adze".
_	The site has since been reexamined in an effort to reanalyze and complement the work that has already been done, but the ramifications of improper excavations of the past are still being felt today, specifically in the unreliable collection of C-14 data and confusing stratigraphy.
_	Foster continues to bring his own personal experiences, and real-life issues to the work that he continues to produce.
_	His son, Dennis Lindsay, is the current president of CFNI and continues the work that his parents started.
_	Series star Lance Henriksen, who portrayed Black, felt that this change was unnecessary and damaged the series, as it discarded the work that had been done to "build up" the Group in previous seasons.
_	Her origin is not known for certain; she was born in ca 1236, and the biography of Archbishop Danilo states that "she was of a French family" and a continuator of the work that "the family was of royal or imperial blood".
_	It represents either part of all of the work that Brodkey labored over for more than a quarter century, and which had originally been announced as "A Party of Animals".
_	He is mentioned later that year in "Europe a Prophecy" and it is in the work that Urizen is freed from his bounds and he opens the Book of Brass in response to the American revolution.
_	Not because they like him but they believe that if they are going out, then they will not concentrate on the work that needs to be done.
_	Which is similar to the work that their father did giving exposure to young talent.
_	Craghoppers also premiered a documentary film called "Hope" detailing the work that the Dian Fossey Gorilla Fund carry out.
_	His revisions are also part of the history of the work that is currently available as Lewis and Short's "A Latin Dictionary".
_	Despite the work that went into the show and the diverse collection of guests, Parton was said to have been less than pleased with the end product, as she found herself singing standards like "My Funny Valentine" (which she felt didn't suit her voice or musical style), and interacting with guests with whom she had little in common.
_	In his acceptance speech he stated:”I feel honoured because this prize represents the full recognition of the work that my colleagues and I have been doing so far.”
_	He remained confident the four House committees investigating Benghazi—the Armed Services Committee, Foreign Affairs Committee, Intelligence Committee, and Oversight and Government Reform Committee—were sufficient and that there was no reason to set up a fifth committee, saying "At this point in time I see no reason to break up all the work that's been done and to take months and months and months to create some select committee."
_	A manuscript is the work that an author submits to a publisher, editor, or producer for publication.
_	It is likely that the "Suśruta-saṃhitā" was known to the scholar Dṛḍhabala (fl. 300-500 CE, also spelled "Dridhabala"), which gives the latest date for the version of the work that has survived into the modern era.
_	Part of the work that led to the new rules was a collaboration with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service; the ESA requires federal agencies to consult with the Fish and Wildlife Service to ensure their actions do not jeopardize the continued existence of an endangered or threatened species, or adversely modify critical habitat.
_	""There has been in existence in his family for some generations an idea that there should be erected some day a house which would be at the same time a memorial of the Herkomers and a record of the work that they had done in the world.""
_	Schininà met and received a blessing from Pope Leo XIII in Rome in a private audience that happened in 1890 and the pope hailed the work that she was doing.
_	This was just some of the work that saw the Train removed from the 11th Division and directly attached to the IX Corps Engineers, becoming responsible for all work afloat or on the beach up to the high-water mark that the Navy might require.
_	Without Walpole's effort towards defending the work that his team had done in discovering a possibly revolutionary source for breast cancer treatment, Tamoxifen could have become a discarded or under-researched idea.
_	According to "The Straight Dope", Herbert Parmet later analyzed the text of "Profiles in Courage" and wrote in his book "Jack: The Struggles of John F. Kennedy" (1980) that although Kennedy did oversee the production and provided for the direction and message of the book, it was clearly Sorensen who provided most of the work that went into the end product.
_	It is presumed that because this portion is on the edge of the work that was added last.
_	Eventually, he became so associated with the work that he was referred to in some circles as "Khachaturian Kapell."
_	However, it is also possible that Bukaneg wrote the text of the work that has been sung for centuries by the Ilocano and thus preserved it for eternity.
_	The project for which the library won the prize is the work that it is doing with students at the nearby Good Samaritan School for the Deaf.
_	They had to perform tasks on the estate, till and farm the land, perform the work that a "colonus" would perform, and remain on the estate.
_	The rest of the novel deals mainly with Shukhov's squad (the 104th, which has 24 members), their allegiance to the squad leader, and the work that the prisoners ("zeks") do in hopes of getting extra food for their performance.
_	Further melodies are introduced but such were the musical ideas of the work that it would not be triumphant and joyful.
_	The "Cyropaedia", in outlining Cyrus as an ideal leader having mastered the qualities of "education, equality, consensus, justice and service to state," is the work that she suggests be used as a guide or example for those striving to be leaders (see mirrors for princes).
_	Since he had been a professor and saw first hand the work that gets done when people are in a setting where they can work together while still having private space to conduct research, he was sure that the way to make the idea of a national laboratory would be to make a campus-like setting for all the invited scientists to collaborate and work on defense and national security.
_	It is no longer being developed, and some of the work that it had done was merged back into OpenBSD.
_	In the lead up to the film's release in October 2012, there was a traveling art exhibition detailing the work that has gone into creating the film.
_	Although it seems that much of "The Elements of Law" was composed before the sitting of the Short Parliament, there are polemical pieces of the work that clearly mark the influences of the rising political crisis.
_	Spaihts returned later in the process to "do some more writing and help bring the movie home", and said he was "delighted" by the work that Derrickson and Cargill had done in the interim.
_	In the work that led to his doctoral thesis, Ehlers proved important properties of the surface around a black hole that would later be identified as its horizon, in particular that the gravitational field inside cannot be static, but must change over time.
_	The second full English translation, into modern English, is the work that resulted from this decision by collaborating translators I. Bernard Cohen, Anne Whitman, and Julia Budenz; it was published in 1999 with a guide by way of introduction.
_	With the work that she accomplished, ships could now move faster and use less fuel, while being maneuvered better in reverse.
_	He particularly was stung by an incident from the work that to him seemed to allude to his own family life.
_	In July 2014, Williams represented Special Olympics Canada at an event held at the White House by President Barack Obama and First Lady Michelle Obama to celebrate the work that Special Olympics as a global organization has done over the course of its existence.
